Outposts of a Dying Empire The Spanish occupation of Alta California now consisted of two pinpoints on the coast, 450 miles apart. In 1771 Serra moved the mission of San Carlos Borromeo from Monterey to the Carmel River. This mission became Serra’s headquarters for the arduous struggle to establish the others. Ultimately, there would be 21 missions in Alta California, 9 of them founded during his lifetime; but at the beginning, only Serra himself foresaw such a degree of success. Differences of opinion between Serra and Governor Fages deepened into a feud. Fages repeatedly vetoed Serra’s requests for new missions because there were not enough soldiers to protect them. Bucareli, Anza, and the Founding of San Francisco Visitor-General Gálvez returned to Spain in 1771, and a new viceroy, Antonio de Bucareli, arrived in the same year. At first Bucareli showed little interest in Gálvez’s new colony, but later he gave it enough care and support to bring it through its precarious infancy. Again the fear of foreign encroachments reinforced Spanish interest in California, the English now rivaling the Russians as objects of concern. The voyages of Captain James Cook in the 1770s indicated a renewed English interest in the Pacific. In 1773, Serra made a journey to Mexico City to plead for more support for new missions and the removal of Lieutenant Fages as governor of Alta California. Bucareli replaced Fages with Captain Rivera, although this would soon involve Serra in more disputes with the new governor than with the old one. About the same time, Captain Juan Bautista de Anza submitted a proposal for an expedition to open a land route from northern Sonora to Monterey. With eager encouragement from Serra, Viceroy Bucareli resolved not only to adopt Anza’s project of a new land route to Monterey, but also to empower him to extend Spanish settlement to the strategic Bay of San Francisco. Anza was an ideal leader for the project. CHAPTER 4 raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 40 CHAPTER 4 Outposts of a Dying Empire 41 The opening of a trail from Sonora to Alta California had been the dream of his family for three generations. He led two expeditions to California, one to explore the trail and the other to bring settlers, including some for the new San Francisco site. On the first of these expeditions Anza rode out from Tubac, a presidio south of Tucson, in January 1774. One of the men with Anza had already traveled through the Colorado River region and had won the confidence of Salvador Palma, chief of the Yumas. The goodwill of the Yumas was a vital factor in the success of Anza’s expeditions. Ferried across the Colorado River with the aid of the Yumas and their tule rafts, Anza and his men struck out westward across the sand dunes of the Colorado Desert, became lost, and finally struggled back to the river after 10 days. After leaving much of their baggage with Chief Palma, they traveled southward to get around the dunes, turned west again, and on March 22, 1774, they reached the Mission of San Gabriel, founded 3 years earlier. Continuing to Monterey, and returning the way he had come, Anza reached Tubac in May, and a few months later went to Mexico City to make a full report to the viceroy. Encouraged by the opening of the new route from Sonora to California, Bucareli promoted Anza to the rank of lieutenant colonel and planned new expeditions for 1775. An expedition to explore San Francisco Bay began under Captain Miguel Manrique, but this commander lost his mind a few days after leaving San Blas and had to be put ashore. He had left several loaded pistols about his cabin, and one of these accidentally exploded, wounding his successor, Lieutenant Juan Manuel de Ayala. The lateness of Spanish settlement of upper California can be vividly seen in the fact that this unfortunate pistol shot occurred within a few days of “the shot heard round the world,” fired at Lexington, Massachusetts, on April 19, 1775, and signaling the beginning of the American Revolutionary War. On August 5 a launch made at Monterey and piloted by Ayala’s sailing master, José Cañizares, became the first Spanish vessel to enter the Golden Gate, known to the Spaniards merely as La Boca, or “the mouth.” Ayala’s ship, the San Carlos, sailed through the next day. His wound confined him to his cabin, but the crew spent several weeks in making a thorough exploration of the arms of the bay with the launch. The names of Angel Island and of Alcatraz (Isla de los Alcatraces, or Island of the Pelicans) date from the Ayala expedition, although the name of Alcatraz was then applied to the island now called Yerba Buena. One of the priests on board felt a “great commiseration” for the Indian children he saw around the shores of the bay, imagining “the many difficulties that would come with the carrying out of a new and far-reaching extension of Spanish authority.” The second Anza expedition also began in 1775 and was responsible for the founding of the presidio and mission at San Francisco in the following year. Except for Anza’s own small escort, this expedition consisted of settlers who would remain in California as pobladores, or populators. There were about 30 soldier-colonists and their families and 4 civilian settlers and their families. The need for married soldiers in California came from both the need for future citizens for the province and the desire to reduce the difficulties with the Indians repeatedly caused by sexual offenses committed by soldiers who were either unmarried or living far from their families in Mexico. raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 41 From the beginning of Spanish settlement, Indian women and girls were the target of brutal attacks and sexual violence. Mounted soldiers at the San Gabriel mission raided local Tongva villages, chasing, lassoing, raping, beating, and sometimes killing native women. Three soldiers at San Diego in 1773 were accused of raping two Kumeyaay girls and murdering one of them. Sent to Mexico for trial, the soldiers were spared their lives but were sentenced to spend the rest of their lives as citizens of California, a somewhat paradoxical verdict reflecting the evil reputation the new colony had in Mexico. The time when people would want to go to California was far in the future; only those in the direst poverty were willing to go, and then only on the promise of the government to outfit them completely and to pay all their expenses for years to come. When the second Anza expedition reached San Gabriel in January 1776, it learned that the Indians had attacked and destroyed the mission at San Diego in the previous November, killing Father Luis Jayme and two soldiers and mutilating the body of Father Jayme. Governor Rivera had only 70 soldiers in the whole province, scattered among five missions and two presidios, and he now induced Anza to join forces with him to punish the rebels in San Diego. Their arrival at the troubled mission, coinciding with those of a supply ship for San Blas and a small land force sent up from the peninsula, completely overawed the Indians. Rivera subsequently was excommunicated by the padres for entering the improvised church to seize an Indian leader who had sought the right of asylum, but who was suspected of being the main instigator of the revolt. In March, Anza’s party of colonists reached Monterey, and Anza himself proceeded to the San Francisco peninsula to choose the sites for the new presidio and mission. For the site of the presidio, Anza chose a point near the northernmost tip of the San Francisco peninsula. The whole northern part of the peninsula consisted largely of sand dunes, but about 3 miles to the southeast of the presidio site Anza found a little oasis on a creek, and here, on March 29, 1776, he marked the site of the mission. He named the creek Laguna de Nuestra Señora de los Dolores because March 29 in the religious calendar was the Day of Sorrows, referring to Our Lady of Sorrows, the Virgin Mary. From this, there later arose the popular name of Mission Dolores for what was officially the Mission San Francisco de Asís. Various obstacles delayed the actual founding of the new establishments for several months. In the meantime, Anza departed for Mexico and left Lieutenant José Moraga in charge of the new colonists. On June 27, 1776, a group of 193 persons, mostly soldier-settlers and their families, arrived at the site of the San Francisco mission. The presidio was formally established under the command of Moraga on September 17, and Father Palóu formally opened the mission on October 9. Neve and the Pueblos of San José and Los Angeles The year 1776 was a time not only of Spanish colonial expansion but also of reorganization. The entire group of frontier provinces of New Spain, including the Californias, was detached from the control of the viceroy at Mexico City and placed under a commandant-general of the “Interior Provinces.” 42 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 42 CHAPTER 4 Outposts of a Dying Empire 43 Within the Californias there was also bureaucratic change. Alta California was now regarded as more important than Baja California, and this was reflected in the reorganization of their joint government in 1776. Felipe de Neve was now appointed governor of both the Californias, with headquarters at Monterey, where he arrived to replace Rivera early in 1777. Neve was another army officer, and Spanish California. (From Indians of California: The Changing Image, by James J. Rawls. Copyright 1984 by the University of Oklahoma Press.) Presidio de San Francisco San Francisco Solano de Sonoma (1823) San Rafael Arcángel (1817) San Gabriel Arcángel (1771) Nuestra Señora de la Soledad (1791) Santa Clara de Asís (1777) Pueblo de San José (1777) San Miguel Arcángel (1797) San Fernando Rey de España (1797) San Francisco de Asís (1776) La Purísima Concepción (1787) San José de Guadalupe (1797) Santa Cruz (1791) Villa de Branciforte (1797) San Juan Bautista (1797) San Carlos Borromeo (1770) San Antonio de Padua (1771) San Luis Obispo de Tolosa (1772) Santa Inés (1804) Santa Bárbara (1786) Presidio de Santa Bárbara Presidio de Monterey San Buenaventura (1782) San Juan Capistrano (1776) San Luis Rey de Francia (1798) San Diego de Alcalá (1769) Presidio de San Diego Pueblo de Nuestra Señora la Reina de los Angeles del Río de Porciúncula (1781) - Mission - Pueblo - Presidio 21 20 14 12 15 13 16 8 2 3 5 11 19 10 9 17 4 7 18 1 6 raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 43 probably the best administrator among the Spanish governors of California. Father-President Serra found Governor Neve even more determined than his predecessors to maintain the authority of the government over that of the missionaries. The governors had been so instructed, because it was the policy of the entire Spanish government at this time to treat the church as essentially an arm of the state. Neve had also been ordered to try to solve the food supply problems of the presidios by establishing agricultural towns or pueblos. With the establishment of secular farming communities, one in the north and one in the south, Neve hoped that the military and civil establishments would no longer have to depend for food either upon the missions or upon the expensive and hazardous supply line from San Blas. In November 1777, he collected 14 men and their families from the presidios of Monterey and San Francisco and settled them at the new pueblo of San José de Guadalupe, the first town to be founded in Spanish Alta California. In the same year, Neve made a personal survey of possible locations for a southern pueblo. He chose a point near the Río de Porciúncula, about 9 miles southwest of the mission of San Gabriel. There was no harbor, and no navigable river, but that was of no importance for a small agricultural community. Neve set September 4, 1781, as the date for the founding of the pueblo, and it has served as the official birthday ever since. Its name was to be El Pueblo de Nuestra Señora la Reina de los Angeles del Río de Porciúncula, or the Town of Our Lady the Queen of the Angels by the River of Porciúncula. That this would soon be abbreviated was rather obviously inevitable, but the part of it to be chosen by popular usage was a matter of accident. It might have been “Porciúncula,” which, because it means “little portion,” would be more than a little incongruous today. It turned out to be “Los Angeles,” or rather, in the Spanish and Mexican periods, usually simply “Angeles.” The modern American expression, “the City of the Angels,” often imagined to be a translation of the name, is inaccurate. It is ironic that San Francisco and Los Angeles, hardly the least materialistic and self-indulgent of modern cities, were named, respectively, for the ascetic Saint Francis of Assisi and for the Virgin Mary. Like the San Francisco colonists, the Los Angeles pobladores were drawn from the poorest classes of Sinaloa, people to whom any change offered some hope of improvement. Neve asked for 24 experienced farmers, but it proved impossible to obtain that many. Early in 1781, 12 settlers and their families were sent north. The Los Angeles settlers and their dependents, 46 persons in all, arrived at San Gabriel mission in August. The overwhelming majority of the settlers were people of mixed racial ancestry, both mestizos and mulattoes. Indeed, about half the founding families were of partial African ancestry; one mulatto settler, Francisco Reyes, served as alcalde (chief administrative and judicial officer) of the pueblo in the 1790s. Indians were the mainstay of the colonial workforce, not only in the missions but also in the pueblos. As historian Steven Hackel has observed, “nearly everything grown or manufactured” at the pueblos “resulted from the labor of Indians.” One of the most persistent problems at these remote outposts of empire continued to be the scarcity of Spanish-speaking women. The few women who were 44 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 44 CHAPTER 4 Outposts of a Dying Empire 45 willing to come were the wives of soldiers, government officials, and early pueblo settlers. Women who were widowed often found employment as llaveras (keepers of the keys) at the missions. Eulalia Arrila de Pérez, the llavera at San Gabriel, supervised the padres’ kitchen, oversaw the laundry, and managed the winepresses and other small manufactures. “It was I,” she later recalled, “who made the chocolate, the oil, the candy, the lemonade. I made so much lemonade that some of it was even bottled and sent to Spain.” Native Resistance The Indians of California responded to missionization in a wide variety of ways. Ambivalence was widespread. “Most individuals,” according to anthropologist Randall Milliken, “struggled with mixed feelings, hatred and respect, in a terrible, internally destructive attempt to cope with external change beyond their control.” Some Indians joined the missions out of curiosity; others came because they viewed the missionaries as shamanlike intermediaries to the spirit world. Many California Indians, however, resisted all efforts at missionization. Historian David Eulalia Arrila de Pérez served as the llavera, or keeper of the keys, at Mission San Gabriel in the 1820s and early 1830s. (Courtesy of the Security Pacific Collection, Los Angeles Public Library.) raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 45 Weber, author of The Spanish Frontier in North America (1992), has neatly summarized the native response to the missions: “Indians only cooperated when they believed that they had something to gain from the new religion and the material benefits that accompanied it, or too much to lose from resisting it.” When the missionaries first arrived among the Gabrielino Indians, the native people “were sadly afraid” and “the women ran to the brush and hid themselves.” Pablo Tac, a Luiseño born at Mission San Luis Rey, recalled how his people had responded to the coming of the Franciscans. The Indians were astonished to see the missionaries, he said, “but they did not run away or seize arms to kill them.” Instead, the native people sat down and watched the missionaries come near. A leader then arose and said, in his own language, “What is it that you seek here? Get out of our country!” Passive resistance in the missions included noncooperation, work slowdowns, and the destruction of tools and equipment. Fugitivism was a constant problem. Thus, one of the principal duties of soldiers garrisoned at the missions was to track down and bring back runaways. Indians also resisted the missionaries’ attempts at conversion. According to Antonio María Osio, it was customary at Mission San José for Indians to receive a dozen or more lashes after Sunday mass for any offenses they had committed during the week. Then, as a sign of submission, the chastened Indians were expected to kiss the missionary’s hand. Osio reported that one new recruit refused to follow the custom, saying to the startled priest: “Father, take your Christianity. I don’t want it anymore because I am returning to my land.” Meanwhile, a Chumash Indian at Mission Santa Barbara sparked a widespread clandestine revitalization movement in 1801. She called on her people to return to the worship of Chupu, the Chumash earth goddess. The woman warned that all converted Indians would die if they did not renounce their baptismal vows and wash their heads with a special water she called “tears of the sun.” Active resistance to missionization included short-lived revolts, occasional attempts to murder individual missionaries, and raids on mission herds by mission fugitives and unconverted Indians. The first violent attack occurred at San Diego on August 15, 1769, within a month of the mission’s founding. Six years later came the killing of Father Jayme when the Indians again attacked the San Diego mission. The most successful instance of violent resistance occurred on the California side of the Colorado River where two settlements were founded in Yuma territory in 1780. Over the protests of the padres, both establishments along the Colorado were peculiar mixtures of mission, presidio, and pueblo. In June 1781 Captain Rivera and a party of married soldiers reached the Colorado on their way to California. Some went ahead to San Gabriel, but about half the party, including Rivera, camped on the eastern bank of the river to rest. Their cattle destroyed part of the Indians’ supply of mesquite beans, and Rivera’s men generally succeeded in antagonizing the Yumas even more than the Spaniards at the new missions had done. On July 17, the Yumas destroyed both missions and the next day crossed the river to surprise and kill Rivera and all his soldiers. The women and children with Rivera were captured. Altogether, 30 soldiers and 4 padres were put to death. Captain Don Fernando Rivera y Moncada, the weary and irascible old veteran, was released from duty at last.
From the Spanish point of view, the Yuma massacre was a terrible disaster. Some of the captives were later ransomed, but no serious attempt was made to punish the Yumas or to reopen the Colorado River route. The Anza Trail remained cut off until the 1820s, and in the meantime there was virtually no land communication at all between Mexico and California. For the next 40 years, from the Yuma massacre in 1781 to the final collapse of Spanish rule over Mexico in 1821, New Spain made little effort to strengthen its outposts in Alta California. There, as elsewhere, the overextended Spanish colonial empire was on the defensive and crumbling. The mission system continued to expand, but it did not succeed in turning the Indians into genuine colonists. Other than the native Indians, there were about 600 persons in Alta California in 1781, and about five times as many in 1821, but the increase was almost entirely from the birth of descendants of the earlier colonists rather than from the arrival of new ones. The numbers of cattle and horses grew much more rapidly, and a fourth institution, the private rancho, began to develop along with the presidios, missions, and pueblos. The Indian population remained an essential but disquieted component in each of these institutions on the remote colonial frontier. “Californias: Antigua y Nueva,” map from Francisco Palou, Relación Historica, 1787. Note the inclusion of the two ill-fated Spanish colonial outposts along the Colorado River. (Courtesy of the California Historical Society, FN-32450.) raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 47 The Impact of the Missions Following Serra’s death in 1784, his longtime companion Francisco Palóu served briefly as father-president. The following year Fermín Francisco de Lasuén became head of the Alta California missions and served as father-president from 1785 to 1803. It was Lasuén who supervised the building of the beautiful churches, several of which are extant, that replaced the crude structures of Serra’s time. Under Lasuén each mission developed into a kind of polytechnical school, teaching the Indians to do fine leather work, operate tile factories and carpentry shops, and even do mural painting. During his tenure as father-president the number of missions doubled, from 9 to 18, and their Indian population more than doubled, rising to about 20,000, nearly as large as it ever became. Early visitors to Spanish California often described in detail the operations of the missions and their impact on the Indians. In 1786 the comte de La Pérouse, a European nobleman engaged in a global voyage of scientific exploration for the French government, visited Monterey. The two vessels under La Pérouse were the first ships, other than those of the Spanish themselves, to visit Alta California since the voyage of Drake more than two centuries earlier. The French visitor had the highest admiration for the character of the missionaries, but he doubted that they were accomplishing anything of permanent value. Under their theocratic system the Indian was “too much a child, too much a slave, too little a man.” Resorting to stocks, irons, and the lash, and the use of soldiers to hunt down those who tried to escape, La Pérouse found a distressing resemblance to the slave plantations he had seen in the West Indies. Five years after La Pérouse’s visit, Monterey welcomed another scientific exploring expedition, this time Spanish, under the command of Alejandro Malaspina. In the crew of one of Malaspina’s ships, incidentally, was the first Anglo-American who came to California and stayed—one John Green, a sailor from Boston who died of dropsy a few hours after the expedition arrived at Monterey in 1791. Malaspina’s impression of the mission system was in considerable contrast to that of La Pérouse. He denounced the “ridiculous inventions of many foreign authors, who, confusing at times the system with the abuses and ignoring always the primary object of such establishments, have painted all our missions in America as horrible and oppressive.” There was no doubt in Malaspina’s mind that the missionaries in California had accomplished a great good. The Spanish priests had brought to the Indians, “the end of a thousand local wars that were destroying them, social beginnings, a pure and holy religion, safe and healthy foods,” and a variety of other blessings. The question of whether the Indians in the California missions were exploited and wretched or contented and appreciative has long been a matter of debate. It has been said that “the preponderant testimony” describes the mission Indians as happy and well-adjusted, preferring mission life to their previous freedom and grateful for close supervision, hard work, colorful rituals, and the salvation of their souls. This is, to say the least, an extremely questionable conclusion. The bulk of the evidence has been the writings of the missionaries, who naturally tended to believe 48 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 48 CHAPTER 4 Outposts of a Dying Empire 49 what they deeply yearned to believe about a matter so vital to their consciences. It is significant that the padres always applied the term “neophytes,” by which they meant apprentices in Christianity, even to Indians who had been born in the missions and spent their entire lives there. The belief that any group of human adults could be happy under a system that treated them as if they were hopelessly retarded children is problematic indeed. The Spanish divided the colonial population, at the missions and elsewhere, into two main groups, the “rationals” and the “irrationals.” The gente de razón, the people of reason, included all who were not full-blooded Indians. This idea of “civilized” or “rational” persons was synonymous with “whites.” Any admixture of white ancestry, mestizo or mulatto, was counted as white and also qualified a person as rational. This distinction was itself irrational. In essence it was a distinction between human and subhuman. (To the extent that the native people perceived this absurd act of definition, they rejected it. From a neophyte at Mission Santa Cruz came a powerful rejoinder: “We aren’t animals.”) Among the rationals, the very few “pure-blooded Spaniards” were at the top of the colonial heap, and degrees of admixture often, effectively, determined social status. The best evidence of how the Indians actually felt about the missions would be the testimony of the Indians themselves, but unfortunately very few of them had any opportunity to get their testimony into the historical record. One who did was Bartolomea, an Indian woman who grew up in Mission San Gabriel and later married the “Scotch paisano,” Hugo Reid. It should be noted that it was Reid who Indians at Mission San Carlos Borromeo in Carmel lined up in rigid formation for the visit of La Pérouse in 1786. From a 1791 watercolor copy of the lost original painting made at the occasion. (Courtesy of the Museo Naval, Madrid.) raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 49 recorded his wife’s recollections and that his non-Catholic background, along with his status as the recipient of a rancho grant carved out of San Gabriel mission lands, gave him a viewpoint that was particularly hostile to the missionaries. The Franciscan historian Father Zephyrin Englehardt described Reid as “that embittered Scotchman” who “lied about religious matters.” Nevertheless, it is clear that Bartolomea (also known as Victoria) regarded life in the mission as a life of misery, humiliation, and terror. The alliance of the padres and the soldiers, she told her husband bitterly, had turned even Indian leaders like her own father into humble, confused, awkward, and shamefaced men. She remembered how the soldiers, armed with muskets, had come to her village when she was 6 years old and taken its people to the mission. At first the Indians had been filled with surprise and astonishment; then a strange lethargy set in. They were told to fear a hell that was lacking in their own religion. Also, corporal punishment was something that had been unknown to them before. One stark episode that Bartolomea remembered from her mission childhood occurred when a Gabrielino (or Tongva) woman who had a miscarriage was charged with infanticide and punished by having her head shaved, by being flogged every day for 15 days, by wearing irons on her feet for 3 months, and by “having to appear every Sunday in church, on the steps leading up to the altar, with a hideous painted wooden child in her arms.” This took place while San Gabriel was under the regime of Father José María Zalvidea, a particularly stern disciplinarian. In Reid’s opinion, Zalvidea “must . . . have considered whipping as meat and drink to [the Indians], for they had it morning, noon and night.” Like Serra, Zalvidea was as stern with himself as with his Indian wards. He often lashed his own shoulders and back, and under his coarse robe he always wore a belt with iron points pressing into his flesh. He made San Gabriel “the Pride of the Missions,” and yet to a man of his faith, pride was the first of the seven deadly sins. Perhaps this conflict was one of the things that unbalanced his mind; he later suffered a nervous breakdown and was transferred to San Juan Capistrano for hospitalization. As the story of Bartolomea suggests, the impact of the missions on California Indian women was especially severe. Father Mariano Payeras reported in 1810 that “the majority of the pregnant women have produced still-born babies,” noting further that the practice continued despite all efforts by the missionaries to suppress it. It is unknown whether these still-births occurred naturally or were abortions induced as acts of resistance. Historian Virginia M. Bouvier, author of Women and the Conquest of California (2004), has argued that the high rate of miscarriage may have been a result of the missionaries’ prohibition of traditional rituals that introduced young women to essential information about sexuality and childbirth. The missionaries also imposed a system of patriarchy that often undermined the status of women within native society. Women were further degraded by the rapes perpetrated by Spanish-speaking soldiers and civilians. Young unmarried women were required by the missionaries to live in cloistered quarters, locked down at night, to preserve their chastity (and to prevent their escape). “Female separation from the extended family,” historian James Sandos has observed, “must have been emotionally painful.” 50 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 50 CHAPTER 4 Outposts of a Dying Empire 51 Also from the history of the San Gabriel mission we have the testimony of a 24-year-old shaman named Toypurina. In 1785 she participated in a conspiracy of neophytes and unconverted Indians to destroy the mission. Like other shamans and native leaders, Toypurina likely regarded the missionaries as a threat to her traditional status and authority. When questioned about her role in planning the revolt, Toypurina expressed the anger that she and many of her people felt toward the Spanish colonizers: “I hate the padres and all of you, for living here on my native soil, for trespassing upon the land of my forefathers.” A more positive view of mission life comes from a manuscript written by Pablo Tac, the mission Indian born at San Luis Rey. Tac and another Luiseño youth were taken to Rome by a missionary in 1833. In his manuscript, deposited in the Vatican Library, Tac expressed thanks to God for the coming of the missionaries to California. He did observe, however, that thousands of his people died as “a result of a sickness that came to California” and that many left “for the woods” rather than submit to Spanish domination. The most revealing evidence of the impact of the missions on the California Indians was recorded in the mission registers. There one finds a terrifying death rate, caused primarily by diseases for which the Indians lacked immunity. Confinement within the adobe walls of the missions also deprived the Indians of the degree of sanitation they had enjoyed from their sweathouses and their practice of occasionally burning their old dwellings and building new ones. Concentration of “Habitants de Californie,” a poignant and powerful image of five native men at Mission San Francisco, from Louis Choris, Voyage Pittoresque Autour du Monde, 1822. Choris was the official artist of a Russian expedition that visited San Francisco in 1816. (Courtesy of the California Historical Society, Templeton Crocker Collection, FN-30510.) raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 51 Indians in large numbers at the missions, the changes in diet, and the imposition of an alien discipline and regimentation all contributed to the high death rate. The mission registers also reveal an infant mortality rate that was three or four times higher than in Europe of the time: more than half the Indians born in the missions died before their fifth birthdays. During the entire mission period, the native population from San Francisco Bay to San Diego fell from 72,000 to 18,000—a decline of over 75 percent. Although the missions altered many dimensions of native culture—introducing a new language, religion, and economy—the goal of radical transformation was only partially achieved. Historian Lisbeth Haas, author of Conquests and Historical Identities in California (1995), has effectively demonstrated the persistence of native ethnic identities and social structures. Preconquest Indian traditions and material cultures were not eradicated by the mission system, in spite of its disruption of virtually every aspect of native life. The debate over the impact of the missions on the California Indians was revived in recent decades by the movement to have Junípero Serra declared a saint. The canonization process began in 1934 on the 150th anniversary of Serra’s death. Thousands of documents on Serra and the missions were assembled by church historians, and in 1985 Pope John Paul II declared Serra to be “venerable,” the first step toward sainthood. Three years later the pope elevated Serra to the second step, declaring him “beatific.” Supporters of the Serra cause rejoiced that the church at last “recognized the extraordinary holiness of this man who was the founder of civilization in California.” Opponents denounced the move. Some described Serra as a sadist and a fanatic, while one critic of the mission system complained that the canonization of Serra “would be another insensitive reminder of past oppression and maltreatment.” Likewise, when Congress in 2004 authorized federal funds to restore the missions as historical treasures, opponents demanded that evidence of the “horrible ordeals” endured by the mission Indians “be clearly and visibly provided to all visitors.” Attempts at Reinforcement At the end of the eighteenth century, Spain began to experience a long series of international difficulties in which it would gradually drift from humiliation into utter disaster. In 1790, in a treaty with England, Spain was forced to give up its claims to exclusive rights on the Pacific coast north of California. George Vancouver was appointed as a British commissioner to work out details of the application of the treaty, and in 1792 and the following year he visited several points in California, with special interest in the presidios. The fourth and last of these, at Santa Barbara, had been established in 1782. Vancouver was amazed at their weakness. At the time of his visits, there were two cannons at the presidio of San Francisco, neither of them serviceable, and three at San Diego, none of them even mounted. Santa Barbara had two cannons, and Monterey eight. The Spanish authorities, worried because the extent of this weakness would now be known to 52 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 52 CHAPTER 4 Outposts of a Dying Empire 53 the British government, made plans to try to strengthen their feeble hold on the province. In 1796 the viceroy, the marqués de Branciforte, and the governor, Diego de Borica, made plans for a new type of pueblo to be colonized by retired soldiers and their families. These ex-soldiers not only would be self-supporting, but also would provide a ready reserve in case of foreign incursions. The attempt to carry out this project illustrated the able planning that so often characterized Spanish colonial administration, and the typical frustration of such planning by hopeless difficulties. The site of the new pueblo, to be called the Villa de Branciforte, adjoined the lands of Mission Santa Cruz—to the bitter objections of the padres. The funds available for founding the new town were sadly inadequate. Not a single ex-soldier could be found in Mexico who would go there voluntarily, and nearly all the colonists who finally arrived in 1797 were men convicted of petty crimes, now sentenced to live in a Spanish version of Botany Bay. It is not surprising that the Villa de Branciforte did not flourish, although it struggled along for many years as a collection of huts. Such was the last attempt under Spanish rule to found any new civil or military establishment in California, with the exception of a few cattle ranchos on lands granted mainly to noncommissioned officers retired from garrison duty. Spanish prospects in California were dismal, even though Governor Diego de Borica, a jovial Basque who was an early California booster, did his best to brighten the picture in a number of his reports. “This is a great country,” he wrote soon after his arrival at Monterey, “the most peaceful and quiet country in the world; one lives better here than in the most cultured court of Europe.” Toward the end of his governorship (1794–1800), Borica was still interlarding his reports with such glowing remarks as, “To live much, and without care, come to Monterey.” But in view of the fact that ill health was causing him to beg for retirement, as Rivera and Neve had done before him, we must suspect that his continued praise of life in California may have been designed to help in finding a willing and competent replacement. This was not easy. The governorship of California was not one of the more desirable posts in the Spanish colonial service. Exploration of the Central Valley Spanish settlement in Alta California was confined to a thin coastal strip. Except for the two short-lived establishments on the Colorado, which were wiped out by the Yumas, the farthest-inland Spanish settlement was Mission Soledad—only 30 miles from the sea. Following the discovery of the Central Valley by Pedro Fages during his exploration of the northeastern reaches of San Francisco Bay in 1772, there were periodic efforts to find places suitable for missions in various parts of the great interior region. No missions were actually founded there, however, and the purposes of most of the Spanish expeditions into the valley were no more than those of pursuing escaped neophytes, punishing occasional raiders, and recovering stolen cattle and raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 53 horses. The frequent raids on the livestock of the coastal settlements were carried on mainly by Indians who had once lived in the coastal areas but had fled to the interior to avoid missionization. The outstanding figure among Spanish explorers of the Central Valley was Lieutenant Gabriel Moraga. His father, José, the first commandant of the Presidio of San Francisco, had brought Gabriel to California as a boy with the second Anza expedition. Between 1805 and 1817, the younger Moraga led a large number of expeditions into the great valley. He was responsible for such names as those of El Río de Nuestra Señora de la Merced (the River of Our Lady of Mercy); El Río de Los Santos Reyes (the River of the Holy Kings); the San Joaquin and Sacramento rivers; Mariposa, from the many butterflies seen there in 1806; and Calavares, a place of skulls. The Coming of the Russians In the early nineteenth century, the Spanish claim of exclusive rights to settlement in California was challenged by the establishment of a Russian fur-trading outpost north of San Francisco. Count Nikolai Petrovich Rezanov, an official of the RussianAmerican Fur Company, visited San Francisco in the spring of 1806. He came seeking supplies to relieve the danger of starvation in the Russian colony at Sitka, and incidentally investigating the possibilities of the fur trade in northern California itself. The Spaniards were aware that the Russian position in the Pacific northwest was almost as weak as their own, and they were concerned lest it be strengthened. Trade between Spanish colonies and foreigners was illegal. In the face of such difficulties, Rezanov’s mission seemed doomed to failure. At this point, “seeing that our situation was not getting better,” he decided to improve it by a proposal of marriage to Doña Concepción Argüello, the 15-yearold daughter of the commandant of the San Francisco presidio. Apart from the international political complications, there was a further impediment to granting Rezanov’s request for the young woman’s hand: he was of the Eastern Orthodox faith, whereas she was Roman Catholic. But her pleas moved the hearts of her father, the governor, and of the padres, and permission was given subject to ultimate approval in Rome. Rezanov then explained that he also would have to secure permission and that this would require him to consult the religious authorities in St. Petersburg, as well as the czar himself. Thus, the wedding was postponed until his next visit to San Francisco, and in the meantime, he was permitted to gather a cargo of supplies from the missions. Rezanov never returned to California, having died in the course of his journey to Russia. It was several years before the news of his death reached his fiancée. Inevitably, accounts of this poignant episode have varied in their estimates of the sincerity of Rezanov’s intentions. His own account suggests that he contemplated an honorable marriage, although one of diplomatic convenience. Interpretations of the young woman’s feelings have also varied. Bret Harte, in his poem “Concepción Argüello,” invited his readers to “listen to the simple story of a 54 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 54 CHAPTER 4 Outposts of a Dying Empire 55 woman’s love and trust.” Others have pointed out that the story was not that simple. In fact, it appears that Concepción’s youthful love for Nikolai Petrovich, a man 35 years older than herself, was inspired in part by the contrast between the impoverished life of the presidio and her dreams of life at the court of St. Petersburg. Rezanov’s diplomacy secured only a temporary trading concession. In 1812 the Russian-American Fur Company built a fortified village, which it called Ross, a name derived from the same root as the word “Russia.” Located on the coast about 18 miles north of Bodega Bay, Fort Ross had several purposes. It was intended to produce food not only for itself but for the company’s operation in Alaska, to serve as a headquarters for the hunting of sea otter in northern California waters, and also to serve as a station for the trade that the Russians hoped to open on a regular basis with the Spanish Californian settlements. Though such trade was still forbidden by the Spanish government, locally it was very much needed and wanted, and at this time Spain and Russia were on friendly terms. The Russians insisted that their new settlement carried no hostile intent and professed to believe that San Francisco was the northernmost limit of Spain’s legal possession of the coast. They knew that the Spaniards had no force available that could drive them out, and they politely disregarded the formal Spanish protests. On one occasion the garrison at San Francisco had to borrow powder from a visiting Russian ship in order to fire a salute from the only cannon in the presidio that could still be fired with any safety. The Last Years under the Spanish Flag Some of the little scenes that were being enacted in the frontier colony of California during this period were colorful and admirable; others were pitiful and drab. In any case, they received very little attention from the Spanish government, which was in an increasingly tragic situation. In 1807 Napoleon Bonaparte lured the Spanish royal family to France for a visit, threw them into prison there, and announced that his brother, Joseph Bonaparte, would be the new king of Spain. In the spring of 1808, the Spanish people rebelled against this French regime, and for 5 years Spain was locked in one of the bitterest struggles in history. Meanwhile, Spain had little strength to spare for ruling its colonies, and long and sporadic wars of independence set in. Amid the surging tides of world events, California remained a stagnant backwater. The Mexican War of Independence began in 1810 when the Creole priest, Miguel de Hidalgo, published his famous outcry against tyranny from his parish in the village of Dolores. Until the news of Mexico’s final independence in 1821 reached California the following year, few people in that isolated colony other than the governors and a few of the padres had any understanding of the issues involved in the terrible internal strife that was taking place in Mexico and Spain. Nor was there much interest in those struggles except for complaints that because of them the supply ships from San Blas came less often, and for several years did not come at all. The people of the presidios and pueblos suffered not only from the absence of all the little extra comforts of life, but even from the absence of clothing other raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 55 than crude homemade articles. They became intensely jealous of the selfsustained and growing wealth of the missions. The padres were enjoying the fruits of choice lands and well-irrigated gardens—oranges and grapes, wines and brandies— tended by a large force of Indian laborers. Padres, as well as others, were increasingly inclined to engage in contraband trade with foreign vessels, exchanging cowhides and tallow for cloth and other luxuries. The most sensational events of the period were the looting and burning of Monterey and San Juan Capistrano in 1818 by two privateering vessels sailing under the Argentine flag and commanded by the Frenchman Hippolyte de Bouchard. California was loyal to Spain, hence the military justification for these acts of pseudo-patriotic piracy. Such was California’s only participation in the wars of independence. Three years later the tattered flag of Spain was lowered for the last time at Monterey, and the new banner of Mexico, bearing an eagle and a snake, was raised in its place. Selected Bibliography David J. Weber’s The Spanish Frontier in North America (1992) and Peter Gerhard’s The North Frontier of New Spain (1982) place California in broad context, whereas John A. Schutz’s Spain’s Colonial Outpost (1985) is more narrowly focused. Weber (ed.), New Spain’s Far Northern Frontier (1979), is an excellent collection of essays. Rose Marie Beebe and Robert M. Senkewicz (eds.), Lands of Promise and Despair (2001), contains a wealth of voices from the period. Bernard E. Bobb, The Viceregency of Antonio Maria Bucareli (1962), includes a description of Bucareli’s policies toward California. Herbert E. Bolton, Anza’s California Expeditions (five volumes, 1930), exhaustively chronicles the two expeditions, while an interpretive summary appears in Vladimir Guerrero, The Anza Trail and the Settling of California (2006) and Donald T. Garate, Juan Bautista de Anza (2003). See also Doyce B. Nunis, Jr. (ed.), The Founding Documents of Los Angeles (2004). The first two volumes of History of California included in The Works of Hubert Howe Bancroft, are a compendium of detailed information. For a demographic analysis of Spanish California, see William Marvin Mason, The Census of 1790 (1998). Carlos López Urrutia, El Real Ejército California (2000) and Joseph P. Sánchez, Spanish Bluecoats (1991) describe the Catalonian soldiers who served on the northern frontier. The literature on the impact of the missions on the Indians is extensive. Among the best recent accounts are Steven W. Hackel, Children of Coyote, Missionaries of Saint Francis (2005); Jesús F. de la Teja and Ross Frank (eds.), Choice, Persuasion, and Coercion (2005); James A. Sandos, Converting California (2004); Kent G. Lightfoot, Indians, Missionaries, and Merchants (2004); Robert H. Jackson, From Savages to Subjects (2001); Lisbeth Haas, Conquests and Historical Identities in California (1995); Jackson and Edward Castillo, Indians, Franciscans, and Spanish Colonization (1995); Randall Milliken, A Time of Little Choice (1995); Jackson, Indian Population Decline (1994); George Phillips, Indians and Intruders in Central California (1993); and Castillo (ed.), Native American Perspectives on the Hispanic Colonization of Alta California (1991). The most damning account of the missions appears in Rupert Costo and Jeannette Henry Costo (eds.), The Missions of California: A Legacy of Genocide (1987). An earlier critique appears in Sherburne F. Cook, The Conflict between the California Indian and White Civilization, Part II (1943). For more 56 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 56 CHAPTER 4 Outposts of a Dying Empire 57 positive views see Russell Skowronek and Elizabeth Thompson, Documentary and Material Evidence of Life on the Alta California Frontier (2006); and Francis F. Guest, Hispanic California Revisited (1996) and Fermin Francisco de Lasúen (1973). On matters of gender, see Barbara L. Voss, The Archaeology of Ethnogenesis (2008); Virginia M. Bouvier, Women and the Conquest of California (2004); and Albert L. Hurtado, Intimate Frontiers (1999). On the controversy over the missions’ founder, see James A. Sandos, “Junípero Serra’s Canonization and the Historical Record,” American Historical Review, XCIII (December 1988), pp. 1253–1269. For the views of foreign visitors, see Malcolm Margolin (ed.), Monterey in 1786 (1989) and Donald C. Cutter, California in 1792 (1990). Accounts of the coming of the Russians include W. Michael Mathes, The RussianMexican Frontier (2008); Jeremy Atiyah, The Great Land (2008); and James R. Gibson, Imperial Russia in Frontier America (1976). On the Bouchard raid of 1818, see Peter Uhrowczik, The Burning of Monterey (2001). raw06961_ch04_040-057.qxd 12/24/10 7:31 AM Page 57 58 CHAPTER 5 A Marginal Province of a Troubled Republic As one of the most isolated and least valued of all the colonial possessions of Spain, California had grown used to being neglected. The independent nation of Mexico, periodically torn with revolutionary disturbances, was even less able than Spain had been to concern itself seriously or effectively with the distant northern region. Government and Politics in Theory and Practice The most influential framers of the Federal Constitution of the United Mexican States, adopted in 1824, were liberal idealists who modeled their country’s new organic law in part on that of the United States of America. But there were great differences between the political, economic, and social backgrounds of the two countries. In Mexico, not even the upper class had acquired any substantial experience in self-government under Spanish colonial rule, and only a tiny fraction of the people were literate and prosperous enough to take an informed part in public affairs. Nevertheless, on paper the constitution of 1824 guaranteed both complete political equality and complete racial equality. Not only were Indians entitled to vote and to hold office, but like all other citizens, they were supposed to enjoy full freedom of person and property. The liberal Mexican constitution makers of 1824 dreamed of developing a civil society and a prosperous economy in which republican government and equal rights for all people could become more than empty phrases. As applied to the remote province of California, these vague hopes led to several new policies. Governors of California were now authorized to permit freer trade with foreigners, subject only to import duties, to move toward secularization of the missions, and to increase rancho land grants, including grants to foreigners willing to be naturalized and to accept Roman Catholicism. Under the first Mexican constitution, California was only a territory, not a state, although it was later promoted to the rank of a “department” in the 1830s. Governors raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 58 CHAPTER 5 A Marginal Province of a Troubled Republic 59 were appointed by the government of Mexico. There was a provincial legislative branch, of sorts, in the form of an elected diputación, but in practice it functioned only occasionally, when the governor chose to convene it, and then merely as an advisory rather than a legislative body. In effect, the governor not only acted as the civil and military executive, but also controlled the provincial lawmaking process, and he exercised nearly all the judicial authority in the more important matters. The general government of California remained what it had been under Spain, a petty military despotism. Control from Mexico City, however, was greatly weakened because the government could provide few soldiers of any sort, and none competent or reliable, for service in California; it lacked the money to pay them. During California’s Mexican period, one important substitute for a system of checks and balances did arise: the comic-opera “revolution,” a political device characterized by bombastic pronouncements, chesslike marches and countermarches, and noisy but bloodless artillery duels, just out of range, in which both sides retrieved each other’s cannonballs and fired them back. As the power of the Mexican governors and the Franciscan missionaries weakened, the real authority in California gravitated into the hands of a small group of ranchero families, mostly California-born. The fact that these families were so closely intermarried was one reason that there was so little actual killing in battles between revolutionary factions. There was too much risk of killing a brother-in-law. The main political motives of the leaders of this little ranchero oligarchy were, first, the hope of taking over from the missions their lands, their cattle, and their Unidentified artist, Costume de la Haute Californie and Dame de Monterey, 1837. These hand-colored lithographs from the voyage of Abel Du Petit-Thouars capture the provincial dress of two proud Californios. (Courtesy of the Bancroft Library.) raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 59 Indian workers and, second, the desire for political power and glory. In their struggles to achieve these objectives, the Californios, the Spanish colonists and their descendants, were badly divided by personal, factional, and sectional disputes. In the rivalry between norteños and sureños, such northern California leaders as Juan Bautista Alvarado, Mariano Guadalupe Vallejo, and José Castro were aligned against southern California politicos like José Antonio Carrillo, Pío Pico, and Juan Bandini. Confronted by the restless ambitions of these volatile native sons of California, governors sent up from Mexico had an increasingly difficult time. Philosopher Josiah Royce later maintained that the bloodless revolution, given the limitations of its social and historical contexts, was really a comparatively civilized method of settling internal political differences. Government by mock revolution had serious defects, however, and one of these was that the resulting decisions were likely to be temporary. In one 5-year period, from 1831 to 1836, Mexican California had 11 distinct gubernatorial administrations, not counting three men who were appointed to the governorship by Mexico, but whom the Californians did not permit to take office. By contrast, there had been only 10 governors in the whole period of more than half a century of Spanish rule. The Secularization Problem By far the most important political issue in the province during the 1820s and 1830s was the question of the secularization of the missions, or rather, and more realistically, the question of who was to profit from the acquisition of their lands and herds. This troublesome problem so far overshadowed all others that the whole story of the political and quasi-military events can best be understood in connection with it. As early as 1749, by royal order, the Spanish government had made an attempt to secularize the missions of Mexico—that is, to turn the mission properties over to the Indians and replace the missionaries with secular clergy. (Secular clergy were simply parish priests, not members of a religious order such as the Jesuits or Franciscans.) This attempt was abandoned largely because there were not enough secular priests available. When Mexico gained its independence in 1821, the California missionaries were alarmed. Most of the missionaries were Spaniards, and as such they were targets for the hostility of Mexican revolutionary nationalists. For centuries the Creoles had hated the gachupines. A Creole, or criollo, was a person who had been born in the Spanish American colonies; sometimes the word meant a person of entirely European ancestry; sometimes it was used without regard to racial origin. The Mexican word gachupines, referring to men born in Spain, had originally meant “those who wear spurs,” and it implied, usually correctly, that the Spanish-born regarded themselves as superior beings. For centuries the Spanish church had been an integral part of Spain’s authoritarian system of colonial control. Inevitably, republican theories were often anticlerical. Such theories, however, were often rationalizations for avarice. There was rising criticism of the missions for their temporal wealth and for their exploitation 60 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 60 CHAPTER 5 A Marginal Province of a Troubled Republic 61 of the Indians. Unfortunately these were the same privileges that many an eloquent anticlerical wanted to appropriate for himself. Typical was the complaint of Vallejo that just “twenty-one mission establishments possess all the fertile lands.” The padres argued that the mission Indians were not ready, for secularization, and this was certainly true. That the missions had failed to make them ready after more than half a century and showed no signs of ever making them ready, were facts that the missionaries blamed on the alleged inherent defects of the Indians rather than on the defects of the mission system or on their own desire to perpetuate it. Meanwhile, the Indians themselves were becoming increasingly restive. In 1824, during a concerted rebellion, they briefly took over control of the missions at Santa Barbara, Santa Inés, and La Purísima Concepción, with some loss of life and much property damage. Soldiers crushed the insurrection after a battle in which there were many Indian casualties. In 1829 a Lakisamni Yokuts named Estanislao, after the Polish Saint Stanislaus, became the leader of a large pan-Indian band in the San Joaquin Valley. He issued a ringing challenge to the Mexican authorities: “We are rising in revolt. . . . We have no fear of the soldiers, for even now they are very few, mere boys . . . not even sharpshooters.” Near the river that was later named after him, “Stanislaus” and his followers fought a battle with 100 soldiers and militiamen under Lieutenant Mariano Vallejo. This and other campaigns completely failed to subjugate Estanislao’s band of nearly a thousand ex-neophyte and gentile warriors. Until the end of the Mexican period, they would continue to block Mexican settlement of the San Joaquin Valley. Valley Yokuts and other Indians also continued to raid coastal settlements, driving livestock deep into the interior. The raids were motivated in part by hunger— Indian consumption of cattle increased as traditional food sources were rendered inaccessible. The raids also were part of a growing Indian commerce with horse traders and New Mexican rustlers from east of the Tehachapis. Historian George Phillips has characterized the raids as evidence of the Indians implementing “strategies of offensive resistance.” The Yokuts served as enterprising middlemen in the expanding trade, much to the consternation of the Californios. From Echeandía to Figueroa The first governor of California under the Mexican republican constitution, or more precisely and officially the first jefe político superior and comandante general militar, was José María Echeandía, a lieutenant colonel of engineers. He arrived in 1825 with instructions to proceed cautiously and gradually toward ultimate secularization; however, though he drafted various plans for this eventuality, a number of formidable difficulties stood in the way. The missions were still the chief source of supplies for the presidios. Cash revenues for the territorial government depended on duties levied on the goods imported in exchange for California cowhides and tallow, and the missions were still the chief producers of the hides and tallow. To add to the governor’s troubles, he was in poor health and spent much time in San Diego to escape the fogs of the north. In 1829, the unpaid soldiers at Monterey raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 61 revolted under the leadership of an ex-convict who had been sent to California as a part of his sentence. The revolt was suppressed after a bloodless “battle” near Santa Barbara, but later in the same year, in deep discouragement, Echeandía submitted his resignation. Early in 1830 a conservative and proclerical “centralist” faction gained control of the government in Mexico. Its appointee as governor of California was a reactionary politician and army officer, Lieutenant Colonel Manuel Victoria, a vigorous opponent of secularization and a stern believer in the virtues of military authority. Shortly before the centralist coup, the previous Mexican regime had appointed the radical republican José María Padrés as governor, but before he could take office, his appointment was superseded by Victoria’s. Padrés remained in California in his earlier position of adjutant inspector of troops. He despised both the personality and the ideas of the man who would now hold the higher office. Padrés was not only a bitter critic of the missions, but also a man of considerable ability and personal magnetism, and several young Californians, including Vallejo and Alvarado, became his disciples. He taught them, as historian Hubert Howe Bancroft put it, “to theorize eloquently on the rights of man, the wrongs of the neophytes, and the tyranny of the missionaries.” Shortly before Victoria arrived at Monterey, Padrés induced the outgoing Governor Echeandía to issue an order for general secularization. When Victoria reached the capital early in 1831, he promptly suspended this decree and soon afterward proclaimed a number of repressive measures. For their opposition to his policies he banished several prominent men, including Padrés, and imprisoned several more. The result was an insurrection in southern California, led by José Antonio Carrillo and ex-governor Echeandía. When a small force under Governor Victoria met the rebels north of Cahuenga Pass, near Los Angeles, on December 4, 1831, hostilities might have been confined to the verbal level if the governor had not made a disparaging remark about the fighting qualities of his own men. One of his aides, Lieutenant Romualdo Pacheco, was so goaded by this sarcasm that he drew his saber and rode out ahead of the governor’s troops. On the rebel side, young José María Ávila was burning with resentment at having been imprisoned in Los Angeles for sedition. He suddenly charged at Pacheco and killed him with a pistol, then spurred toward Victoria and wounded him with a lance thrust. A soldier shot Ávila with a musket, and Victoria, though badly wounded, killed Ávila with his sword. Forty-three years later, a son and namesake of Romualdo Pacheco, born a month before his father’s death, would become one of the American governors of California. By provoking actual bloodshed, Governor Victoria had violated the rules of the California political game. He was packed off to Mexico on the next ship, and there was a chaotic scramble for power. For about a year the south was ruled by Echeandía and the north by Agustín Zamorano. (Zamorano is better known for having imported California’s first printing press, used mainly for the publication of official documents.) The ouster of Governor Victoria was a deathblow to the mission system. Although the conservative faction was still precariously in power in Mexico City, it recognized the need to conciliate the rebellious Californians by permitting secularization 62 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 62 CHAPTER 5 A Marginal Province of a Troubled Republic 63 of the missions and by appointing a governor who could be trusted to carry it out in the fairest way possible. The man selected was Brevet Brigadier General José Figueroa, governor from early in 1833 until his death in 1835. Figueroa and Secularization In terms of both ability and character, Figueroa was by far the best of all the officials sent up by the Mexican republic. The tragedy was that no governor could have arranged the assignments of the mission lands to private ownership in an orderly and satisfactory manner under the conditions that existed. In August 1833, the Mexican Congress adopted an immediate general secularization law that was extremely vague about procedures for carrying it out. It soon appeared, however, that this law was largely the work of that vocal champion of freedom for the Indians, José María Padrés, and that Padrés had also engineered the Mexican government’s approval of an ambitious “colonization” scheme under which he and a group of his Mexican friends were to take over the lands of the missions. His close associate José María Híjar was to be not only the “director of colonization,” but also the new governor of the territory. A substantial number of colonists actually arrived from Mexico to occupy their new estates. Governor Figueroa, however, had already appointed the administrators, or comisionados, who were to supervise the disposal of mission lands, and his appointees were all Californians. A notable example was Mariano Guadalupe Vallejo, appointed by Figueroa as not only the administrator of the Sonoma mission and grantee of the Petaluma rancho, but also the military commander of the whole northern frontier district. When Vallejo, Alvarado, and other former Californian admirers of Padrés heard that among his colonists there were 21 prospective mission administrators from Mexico, and when they recalled that there were just 21 missions, their feelings toward their erstwhile intellectual leader underwent a sharp and sudden change. Fortunately, from their point of view, the credentials of Padrés and Híjar were canceled from Mexico City in another of the kaleidoscopic shifts of Mexican politics. Figueroa’s proclamation of August 9, 1834, defined the general terms under which the process of secularization was to be conducted over the next 2 years. Half the property was supposed to go to the Indians, and the law forbade them to dispose of it, but these provisions were not effectively carried out. Some Indians tried to make a living by farming their small allotments of land near the mission buildings, but none of them retained these lands more than a few years. Many never realized that they were supposed to have been given any land at all. Former mission neophyte Lorenzo Asisara later recalled what it was like for his Ohlone Indian people when Mission Santa Cruz was secularized in 1834. They were granted a portion of the mission land, he remembered, “but it did not do the Indians any good.” The ex-neophytes received “old mares that were no longer productive [and] very old rams.” Many native people, believing that secularization meant emancipation from the gente de razón, responded accordingly. As one raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 63 dismayed observer at Mission San Luis Rey reported in 1834, “The [Indian] workers no longer recognize the voice of the de razón, even that of authority, they refuse to work, insisting that they are a ‘free nation’ . . . in one voice they yell ‘we are free, we don’t want to obey, we don’t want to work.’” The law attempted to limit the killing of cattle at the missions, but as the time of secularization approached, the missionaries slaughtered much of the stock in order to salvage, from the sale of the hides, as much wealth as possible for the Pious Fund. As a result, the missions were surrounded with thousands of skinned carcasses rotting in the sun. For several years the morale of the padres had been declining. Many of them were old men who had lived so long in the missions that they regarded them as their only homes. Some, on the other hand, looked forward to relief from their responsibilities. Shortly before secularization one padre wrote that there was “hardly anything of the religious left in me. . . . instead I must manage temporalities, sow grain, raise sheep, horses, and cows. . . . These things are as disagreeable as thorns . . . and they rob me of time, tranquility, and health both of soul and body.” Because there were no secular parish priests to replace them, the Franciscans remained at the mission churches to continue their religious duties. For a time many of the neophytes remained huddled around the padres, whereas some left the coastal area to find homes with alien tribes in the interior. Indians who had been trained as vaqueros, or cattle wranglers, became laborers on the private ranchos into which the mission lands were gradually subdivided. Still others were able to gain a living as laborers in the towns. 64 PART ONE California Beginnings Mounted vaqueros at Mission San José, from Frederick William Beechey, Narrative of a Voyage to the Pacific, 1831. (Courtesy of the California History Room, California State Library, Sacramento.) raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 64 CHAPTER 5 A Marginal Province of a Troubled Republic 65 The padres had predicted accurately the fate that was in store for the mission Indians when secularization came. As Father-President Durán pointed out, the Indians living in the pueblo of Los Angeles were forced to labor for the merest pittances and were subjected to frightful punishments for their trivial misdeeds; they were given no security of any kind and were in every way “far more wretched and oppressed than those in the missions.” Alvarado and Provincial Autonomy Figueroa was deeply disturbed by the failure of his secularization policies to protect the legal and moral rights of the Indians. In any event, his efforts were cut short when, in the fall of 1835, he died of a stroke. His passing removed a brake from the rapacity of the mission administrators and their friends and relatives, and again plunged California into noisy “revolutionary” struggles for control of the governorship. After the brief terms of José Castro and Nicolas Gutiérrez as acting governors, Mexico sent up a new champion of centralism, Colonel Mariano Chico, who repeated most of the blunders of Governor Victoria and lasted only 3 months before he too was expelled. Juan Bautista Alvarado, the clever and eloquent young president of the diputación, now emerged as the hero of the Californians, particularly the northerners. With the aid of about 30 riflemen led by Isaac Graham, a Tennessee backwoodsman who had come to California to operate a whiskey distillery, Alvarado seized control of Monterey and deported most of the Mexican officials. On November 7, 1836, California was proclaimed “a free and sovereign State,” until Mexico should repudiate centralism and restore the principles of the federalist constitution of 1824. Alvarado became provisional governor, and Vallejo, already in charge of the northern frontier, now became the military commander of the whole California department. Vallejo was Alvarado’s uncle, though only 2 years his senior and also under 30 years old. A broadside from 1837 declaring Juan B. Alvarado to be the governor of the “FREE AND SOVEREIGN STATE OF ALTA CALIFORNIA AND ITS INHABITANTS.” (Courtesy of the California Historical Society, Vault B-97, FN-32452.) raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 65 As one of his first official actions, Alvarado proclaimed that the capital of California would continue at his native Monterey. (An act of the Mexican Congress in 1835 had promoted Los Angeles from a pueblo to a city and ordered the capital transferred there.) Alvarado, however, was forced to placate the southerners by permitting them to choose a subgovernor with considerable regional authority. The government in Mexico City responded by appointing Alvarado as the legal governor of California under the Mexican republic. He accepted this arrangement in 1837 and continued to hold the office for 5 years. In the period before the last fragments of the mission holdings passed into private hands, the administration of these properties grew steadily more corrupt, incompetent, and generally disgraceful. Alvarado and Vallejo soon fell to quarreling with each other over the division of the spoils, and by 1842 they were both so disillusioned with the anarchic state of affairs in the province that they willingly turned over the political and military commands to the last governor from Mexico, Brigadier General Manuel Micheltorena. He was an amiable man, but his administration was no better than those of most of his predecessors. The army of 300 soldiers he brought with him consisted almost entirely of ex-convicts. Because they failed to receive their pay (as usual), they obtained food and other items by a highly informal process of foraging, to the outrage of the local population. Alvarado and José Castro led still another revolt, and there was a new “battle of Cahuenga Pass” in February 1845. It was a repetition of the encounter on almost the same spot in 1831, except that this time the only casualties were a horse and a mule, but it was enough to induce Governor Micheltorena to follow the examples of Governors Victoria, Chico, and Gutíerrez by departing for Mexico, along with his ragged and thieving soldiers. This marked the failure of the last attempt to reestablish any more than nominal Mexican control over California. Pío Pico assumed the governorship with Los Angeles as the capital, but having no influence much farther north than Santa Barbara he had to compromise with the norteños by recognizing José Castro as military commandant. This gave Castro the de facto control of the Monterey customs house and consequently of most of the governmental income. This arrangement, made on the eve of the Mexican War, left the province as weak and divided as it had ever been. The Heyday of the Rancheros Throughout the Mexican period, the most substantial economic activity was cattle raising, and the chief commercial products were hides and tallow for export. The local processing of these commodities went no further than the staking out of the hides to dry in the sun and rendering of the fat into tallow by melting it in kettles, after which it was poured for storage into bags called botas, made out of whole hides. After the missions disintegrated, there was virtually no manufacturing. Rawhide was used as a local makeshift for all sorts of purposes, but the manufacture of hides into shoes and other leather products was done in New England. Even the simple 66 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 66 CHAPTER 5 A Marginal Province of a Troubled Republic 67 processes of making soap and candles out of the tallow were done in Chile or Peru; such ordinary articles as brooms had to be imported. The typical rancho house was a modest affair with little in the way of furnishings. As José del Carmen Lugo, whose family was granted Rancho San Bernardino in 1842, later recalled: “Many of these houses had a door faced with sheepskin, cowhide or horsehide. No door had a lock or key, nor was it necessary, because there was . . . nothing which would be worth taking.” There were about 20 private rancho land grants during the Spanish regime, and about 500 during the Mexican period, of which the great majority were made after secularization and especially by Governors Alvarado, Micheltorena, and Pico. Secularization transferred control over the region’s most valuable resources—land, livestock, and laborers—from the missionaries to the rancheros. It was, in the words of one historian, “the greatest transfer of land and resources in California since the Spaniards first set foot in the region.” Under the liberal Mexican colonization provisions of 1824 and 1828, the maximum legal limit for a private rancho grant in California was 11 square leagues—about 50,000 acres, or 76 square miles. Not even this generous limit was always applied, because in many cases several different grants were made to the same individuals. In a ranching country where a dozen acres of grassland might be required to pasture a single cow through the long, dry summer season, such vast grants were not regarded as too large, and minor discrepancies in boundary measurements were of no importance. The boundaries were laid out without the aid of surveying The Lugo family on their rancho in southern California in the 1880s. (Courtesy of the Seaver Center for Western History Research, Los Angeles County Museum of Natural History.) raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 67 instruments, and the methods of measuring distance ranged from pure guesswork to laying out lengths of a lasso from the back of a horse. As corners of the grant, the diseño, or map, might show markers no more permanent than a pile of stones or a clump of cactus. The whole process was accomplished with an easy informality that was very convenient at the time but which would later contribute to the maddening and almost endless confusion of efforts to establish land titles in American courts. Except for a few grants in the Sacramento Valley, held mainly by naturalized foreigners, the ranchos were located where the missions had been, in a narrow strip along the coast. Cattle were driven on the hoof to the matanzas, or slaughterings, as near as possible to the coastal points where the hides and tallow were stored to await the foreign trading ships. Other than the horse and the mule, the only form of land transportation was the lumbering, springless, spine-jarring carreta, an oxcart with wheels sliced from a big log. Excellent horses, however, were so numerous that they were allowed to run and graze freely, dragging lassos for easy catching. Walking was a lost art. It was much easier to catch a passing horse, ride it where one wished to go, and turn it loose again. To Richard Henry Dana, author of Two Years before the Mast (1840), all Californians in the 1830s seemed to be centaurs. Some of the most skillful riders were the daughters of the rancheros. California girls usually rode with ease by the time they were 6 to 8 years old. “I never saw ladies in the East,” proclaimed one incredulous visitor, “who could approach the poorest of the Spanish ladies whom I have yet seen ride.” Women also became landowners and administrators, receiving about 13 percent of the ranchos granted by the Mexican government. Among the ranchera elite was Apolinaria Lorenzano, the unmarried owner of three ranchos. Rancheras supervised their vast estates in a manner similar to that of their male counterparts. They presided over large households and supervised Indian workers who tended their vast herds and fields. On the typical California rancho there were between 20 and several hundred Indian workers, perhaps 4000 in all. This workforce included former mission Indians and new recruits gathered by the ranch owners. In return for their labor, the Indians usually received nothing more than shelter, food, and clothing. Although the Indian laborers were nominally free, in practice they were bound in a state of peonage for as long as the ranchero cared to hold them. From the ranchero’s point of view, this arrangement was one of beneficent paternalism. In 1841, Francisca Benicia Carrillo de Vallejo mused that she and her husband Mariano cared for their Indian workers “as though they belonged to the family.” But in the same year, a visiting United States naval officer reported that the rancheros valued an Indian’s life scarcely more than “that of one of the wild cattle” and that Mariano Vallejo “is frequently said to hunt them.” From the native worker’s perspective, such dehumanization was anathema. “I am not an animal,” boldly asserted one Indian field hand in 1839. In truth, the rancho economy, like those of the missions and pueblos, contributed to the continuing destruction of California Indian society. As historian Michael 68 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 68 CHAPTER 5 A Marginal Province of a Troubled Republic 69 González has concluded, the ranchero elite subjected Indian laborers to “routines harsher than any toil at the missions.”
The plentitude of cheap Indian labor also contributed to the rancheros’ prodigal hospitality in the entertainment of strangers at social gatherings. Singing and dancing were passions with Californians of all ages. Favorite dances were the fandango, the bamba, and the somewhat more dignified contradanza. The bamba required a señorita to perform its lively and intricate steps with a full glass of water on her head. In one of the easier variations, while constantly tapping the floor with her feet, she had to step into a silken hobble, raise it to her knees, lower it again, and give two or three whirls, all without spilling the water and all to the accompaniment of swift strumming of the guitar and many shouted comments intended to distract her. Apart from weddings, which also occasioned 3-day celebrations, the chief social event was the annual rodeo, or roundup. Because there were no fences, the cattle that roamed over the myriad hills of several neighboring ranchos had to be annually segregated, and the calves branded. Then the families of the district would gather for days and nights of fiesta, with much dancing, brilliant displays of horsemanship, cockfighting, gambling, and sometimes bull and bear baiting. Historian Douglas Monroy has interpreted ranchero society as seigneurial— signifying the status-conscious activities of a “big” man intent on demonstrating The Fandango, a romanticized view of life on a California rancho, painted by Charles Christian Nahl in 1873. (Courtesy of the E. B. Crocker Collection, Crocker Art Museum, Sacramento.) raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 69 dominance over his family, laborers, and land. Thus it was that the colorful fiestas of the rancheros were more than mere diversions: “These highly ritualized occasions gathered all elements of Californio society into a public spectacle at which elites wore their finery, supplied abundant food and copious drink, and danced with elegance. In other words, they displayed their wealth and status to their Indian laborers, the common folk, and themselves.” More recently Michael González, author of This Small City Will Be a Mexican Paradise (2005), has disputed the seigneurial interpretation. The elites of Mexican California, according to González, were not a carefree or extravagant people; rather they were industrious citizens who followed a strict work discipline and exercised considerable restraint in their personal lives. Extravagant or restrained, the absence of education among the Californio elite was almost incredible. Now and then, for a few days or weeks, a retired soldier with almost no knowledge, and with no idea whatever of how to impart what little he had, would be given a pittance to try to operate a “school” at Monterey or at one of the other towns. Instruction was administered alternately with a cato’-nine-tails and a catechism. Vallejo, one of the few literate Californians, recalled with bitterness how one of these incompetent schoolmasters had nearly succeeded in destroying his boyhood interest in learning. These few efforts, except for the teaching of manual arts and church music to the Indians in the missions, represented very nearly the entire history of formal education in California as a Spanish colony and a Mexican province. California’s population in 1845, other than the full-blooded native Indians, was only about 7000. Of these, fewer than 1000 were adult males. The number of native Californians who were literate, even by the loosest definition, was probably no more than 100. Many of the largest landholders could not write their own names. Perhaps no period of history has ever been more extremely romanticized than have “the halcyon days of the dons” in California. As historian Phoebe Kropp has explained in her interpretive California Vieja (2006), the “fantasy heritage” from those days reveals more about the latter-day creators of the romantic images than about any realities of life in Spanish or Mexican California. The colorfulness of the period was sadly superficial, even for the landed ruling class, in spite of their desperate attempts to live the good life. Selected Bibliography On the culture of Mexican California, see Michael J. González, This Small City Will Be a Mexican Paradise (2005) and Douglas Monroy, Thrown Among Strangers (1990). For a neglected aspect of the period, see Damany Fisher, Afro-Latino Influence in California History (2010). The best general survey is David J. Weber, The Mexican Frontier, 1821–1846 (1982). Henry L. Oak’s third and fourth volumes of “Bancroft’s” History of California remain indispensable. Woodrow James Hansen’s The Search for Authority in California (1960) offers a valuable analysis of political and social problems from about 1820 to 1849. 70 PART ONE California Beginnings raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 70 CHAPTER 5 A Marginal Province of a Troubled Republic 71 Recent interest in the status of women has generated considerable scholarship. See especially Jeanne Farr McDonnell, Juana Briones of Nineteenth-Century California (2009); María Raquel Casas, Married to a Daughter of the Land (2007); Rose Marie Beebe and Robert M. Senkewicz (eds.), Testimonios: Early California through the Eyes of Women (2007); and Miroslava Chávez-Garcia, Negotiating Conquest (2004). On secularization, see Stephen W. Silliman, Lost Laborers in Colonial California (2004) and Edward D. Castillo, “An Indian Account,” American Indian Quarterly (Fall 1989), pp. 391–408. Biographical treatments include Carlos Manuel Solomon, Pío Pico: The Last Governor of Mexican California (2010); Robert Ryal Miller, Juan Alvarado (1998); and Alan Rosenus, General M. G. Vallejo (1995). For fascinating memoirs of the period, see Antonio María Osio, The History of Alta California, edited by Rose Marie Beebe and Robert M. Senkewicz (1996) and Californio Voices, edited by Gregorio Mora-Torres (2004). See also Crisostomo N. Perez, Land Grants in Alta California (1996). C. Alan Hutchinson, Frontier Settlement in Mexican California: The Híjar-Padrés Colony and Its Origins (1969), is sympathetic to the colonization scheme and critical of Figueroa. On the romanticization of the period, see Phoebe S. Kropp, California Vieja (2006) and William Deverell, Whitewashed Adobe (2004). raw06961_ch05_058-071.qxd 12/24/10 7:32 AM Page 71 72 American Infiltration The ethnic diversity of modern California was notable even in the period of tenuous Mexican rule. Of the foreigners who came, the most important historically were from the United States. Very few of these, however, came with any original intention of Americanizing the province. The Yankee Traders American interest in California began in the late eighteenth century when New England merchants discovered that there was a lucrative market in China for the fur of the sea otter. These animals flourished, in what were thought to be inexhaustible numbers, along the Pacific coast from the Aleutian Islands to lower California, and particularly along the Alta California shores. The skin of a full-grown sea otter was 5 feet long and more than 2 feet wide, with thick, black, glossy fur, and its value when shipped to the Chinese port of Canton was about $300. The fur seal was more numerous, but less valuable. Although the Spaniards forbade foreigners to obtain furs in California, they could not prevent them from doing so, and ships from New England gained the greatest share of the trade in competition with the British and the Russians. The first recorded anchorage of an American ship on the coast of California was the result of a bizarre incident in the sea otter trade. In 1796 the ship Otter, of Boston, stopped at Monterey on her way to the Hawaiian Islands and China with a cargo of sea otter pelts gathered along the Oregon coast. Her captain, Ebenezer Dorr, asked permission to obtain supplies, which Governor Borica granted. The Yankee captain also asked permission to leave in California several convicts who had escaped from the English penal colony in Australia. Borica refused this request, but Dorr put them ashore at night to get rid of them, even though they had paid him to take them to Boston. Ebenezer Dorr could hardly have been a meaner man if his name had been Ebenezer Scrooge. CHAPTER 6 raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 72 Seven years later another voyage for sea otter brought the Lelia Byrd, of Salem, into the bay of San Diego on the pretext of needing fresh food. Captain William Shaler and First Mate Richard Cleveland tried to make a clandestine agreement with the port commander for the acquisition of a stock of otter skins, but Cleveland was thrown into jail by the Spanish authorities and had to be forcibly rescued by his shipmates. The Lelia Byrd escaped from the harbor only after an exchange of shots with the little battery on Point Loma. Five years later Captain Shaler published an article in the United States that defended his actions as patriotic duty and advocated swift American acquisition of the province. “It would be as easy to keep California in spite of the Spaniards,” he wrote, “as it would be to win it from them in the first place.” By the end of the Spanish period, both the sea otter and the fur seal had been almost exterminated along the coast of California. New England whalers began to pay increasingly frequent visits to the coast, but the main American trading interest in the region now shifted to cowhides and tallow. In 1821 the Mexican revolutionary regime opened the ports of Monterey and San Diego to foreigners, and the spring of 1822 saw the arrival of the John Begg, the first foreign ship to be openly welcomed by California port authorities. Among the passengers on this ship was William E. P. Hartnell, newly appointed manager at Monterey for his partnership with Hugh McCulloch, California agents for the British trading firm of John Begg and Company. McCulloch and Hartnell—or “Macala and Arnell” in the Hispanicized form of the partner’s names—secured a 3-year contract to take all the hides the missions could furnish, at $1 each. The advantage to the British was short-lived. Within a few weeks of Hartnell’s coming, William A. Gale arrived on the Sachem from Boston with a cargo of notions. By bidding up the price of hides to $2, which was still a remarkable bargain, he seems to have persuaded some of the padres to evade their contract with the British agency. Gale became the resident agent of the Boston firm of Bryant and Sturgis, which soon had such a large share of the hide and tallow trade that for years the United States was commonly known in California as “Boston.” During the Mexican period, this one firm was responsible for the export of about half a million hides. Reliable statistics are unavailable, but perhaps 1.25 million hides and 60 million pounds of tallow were loaded on American and British ships between 1826 and 1848. Hides were called “California banknotes” and were, in fact, the province’s main form of currency. Import duties were substantial, ranging at various times from about 25 percent to almost twice that figure. Often these duties were at least partially evaded. Customs officials were paid a commission for keeping their eyes open, but there were Yankee captains who were willing to pay them larger sums to keep their eyes closed. Even if duties were fully paid, however, the profits of bringing out a shipload of New England manufactured goods and returning to Boston with a cargo of hides were as high as 300 percent. The classic description of the hide and tallow trade was written by Richard Henry Dana in Two Years before the Mast. Though it is usually thought of as a portrayal of life at sea and as a tract intended to reform the working conditions of CHAPTER 6 American Infiltration 73 raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 73 74 PART ONE California Beginnings seamen, much of the book was devoted to Dana’s observations ashore in California; the crew, in the employ of Bryant and Sturgis, spent most of the 2-year voyage in collecting hides along the California coast. The Danas of Cambridge were one of the oldest and most distinguished families of New England. As a Harvard undergraduate, Richard Henry had suffered a temporary breakdown of his eyesight, attributed to a case of measles. At the age of 19, in 1834, he signed on as a common sailor for the long voyage to California in the hope that it would improve his health, a purpose which it seems to have accomplished remarkably well almost from the time the ship left Boston harbor. The outward-bound cargo of “everything under the sun” was quickly disposed of at Monterey, where boatloads of eager purchasers were rowed out to the ship as if it were a floating department store. Dana’s pride in his New England heritage was reinforced by what he saw of the Californians, “an idle, thriftless people” who could “make nothing for themselves.” The country abounded in grapes, he wrote, “yet they buy, at a great price, bad wine made in Boston and brought round by us.” Their cowhides, “which they value at two dollars in money, they barter for something which costs seventy-five cents in Boston; and buy shoes (likely made from their own hides, which have been carried twice around Cape Horn) at three and four dollars, and ‘chicken-skin boots’ at fifteen dollars a pair.” Loading the hides was a strenuous operation. Most of the hide depositories had inadequate harbors, and the ship had to be anchored as far as 3 miles offshore. A hide would spoil if it got wet, and each one, stiff and heavy and as broad as the arms could reach, had to be tossed up and balanced on the sailor’s head so that he could wade through the surf and put it into a swaying small boat. The hide and tallow trade was significant not only because it influenced the economic history of New England and of early California, but also because it increased the interest of Americans in this distant region. Two Years before the Mast, published in 1840, brought Americans the same message that Captain Shaler’s article had carried more than 3 decades earlier, but Dana’s message was more substantial and convincing. “In the hands of an enterprising people,” he wrote, “what a country this might be!” The Beaver Trappers Just as American seagoing commerce with California had begun in the quest for the skin of the sea otter, so the history of overland contact had its beginnings in the search for beaver pelts. The trapper was the spearhead of the American landward advance, particularly in the far west; the first recorded overland expedition to California was conducted in 1826 by a young beaver hunter named Jedediah Strong Smith. It was he who deserved the title of “the Pathfinder,” which was bestowed in later years upon a more publicized and less authentic hero, John C. Frémont. Smith set out with 17 men to traverse the vast desert region between the Great Salt Lake and California. His objectives were the opening of a virgin beaver country and the establishment of a place raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 74 of deposit on the Pacific for the furs of this new empire. On November 27, 1826, Smith and his men reached Mission San Gabriel, then at the height of its temporal prosperity. From the jovial Father José Bernardo Sánchez the Americans received a full measure of hospitality, which they remained to enjoy for several weeks. In the words of his biographer, Dale L. Morgan, Jedediah Smith was “an unlikely sort of hero for the brawling West of his time, that West about which it has been said that God took care to stay on his own side of the Missouri River.” The “mountain men” have been portrayed in stereotype as murderous brawlers, given to drunken orgies at their periodic rendezvous. Actually, though there were many such men among them, the personalities and backgrounds of the trappers were remarkably diverse. Smith was a quiet young man who never used tobacco or profanity, partook of wine or brandy only sparingly, and was deeply imbued with a Calvinist religious faith. In December, Smith journeyed to San Diego in the hope of securing Governor Echeandía’s permission to travel in California, but the governor, lacking a full realization of the unlimited energies of American business enterprise, found it difficult to believe that Smith was not a spy. He was inclined to send Smith and his men to Mexico for trial, but he compromised and ordered them to leave California by the way they had come. Smith chose to define “California” as being merely the coastal strip of missions and presidios. Thus, he felt that he had complied with the governor’s orders when, in January 1827, he moved northwestward across the Tehachapis into the San Joaquin Valley. This he found to be a trapper’s paradise, and he had accumulated a large number of pelts by the time he reached the river known thereafter as the American. Late in May, apparently by way of the north fork of the Stanislaus River and Ebbetts Pass, Smith accomplished the first recorded crossing of the Sierra and reached his headquarters in northern Utah on July 3. Within 10 days he was on his way back to California with 18 men, but his situation was worse than it had been in the previous year. At the Colorado crossing, the Mojaves attacked the party and killed 10 of its members. In September the survivors reached the camp of the first expedition in the northern San Joaquin Valley, but when Smith sought assistance at Mission San José, about 15 miles north of the pueblo of the same name, Father Narciso Durán arrested him, and only released him to go to Monterey for another conference with Echeandía. The governor was even more disposed than before to make Smith stand trial for illegal entry into the province, but uncertainty about the consequences of such strong action led to a renewal of permission for the trappers to depart. Early in 1828 they made the first recorded journey by land up the northwestern coast of California and into Oregon. There the Umpquas killed most of the men. With only two others, Smith finally reached the Hudson’s Bay Company headquarters at Fort Vancouver. Three years later he was killed by Comanches on the Santa Fé Trail. While Smith was pioneering the routes between the Great Salt Lake and California, other adventurous American trappers and traders had been making their way from Missouri into New Mexico. The most notable of these was James Ohio CHAPTER 6 American Infiltration 75 raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 75 76 PART ONE California Beginnings Pattie, who pressed on from Santa Fé to California by way of the Gila Valley. Pattie was a very enterprising but intensely conceited and hot-headed young man. In the fall of 1826 he and a party of other fur hunters trapped along the Gila River to the Colorado. Moving northward, they got into a quarrel and then a bloody battle with the Mojaves. In warfare with the Indians, Pattie and his companions committed atrocities as vicious as those of the so-called savages. It is probable that the reason the Mojaves attacked the 1827 expedition of Jedediah Smith, although they had been peaceful during his previous journey through their country, was that they had had dealings with the Pattie expedition in the meantime. When Pattie returned to Santa Fé, the governor of New Mexico confiscated all his furs because they had been gathered in Mexican territory without a license. Undaunted, he set out again along the Gila in the fall of 1827. At San Diego, Governor Echeandía, already irritated by the unauthorized incursions of Jedediah Smith, put these new intruders in jail. Other trappers soon improved upon the routes of Smith and Pattie. In 1833 Joseph Reddeford Walker, a fur trapper from Tennessee and Missouri, made the first recorded westward crossing through the center of the Sierra Nevada. Though their trail over “the dark and deathlike wall” of the Sierra is partly a matter of speculation, it probably lay somewhere between the headwaters of the East Walker River and those of the Tuolumne. They have often been credited with being the first white people to see the Yosemite Valley. Cold, hunger, and exhaustion dulled their appreciation of it that day in the fall of 1833, and indeed some historians have maintained that what they really saw was Hetch Hetchy Valley. Early Settlers The first foreigners to settle permanently in Spanish California did so by accident. In 1814 John Gilroy, a Scottish sailor on an English ship, was left at Monterey because of sickness. He married a daughter of the Ortegas, acquired a part of their lands, and lived to see a flourishing American town, bearing his name, on the site of his rancho. Like so many holders of Mexican titles, however, he would finally lose his property to American land lawyers and squatters. The first American settler in California, or rather the first one around whose name any substantial body of fact and legend has gathered, was Joseph Chapman, sometimes called “the unwilling pirate.” A member of the Bouchard expedition, he was captured at Monterey in 1818 but claimed that Bouchard had shanghaied him in Honolulu. In any case, his skills as a millwright and boatbuilder soon made him a welcome and useful resident. The next few years saw the arrival of several remarkable Yankees who came as traders and remained to gather a great share of the profits of merchandising into their own hands. William Goodwin Dana and Alfred Robinson at Santa Barbara and Abel Stearns at Los Angeles became the chief merchants of their communities and, partly by marriage, large landowners as well; Thomas O. Larkin became the most important merchant in Monterey. raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 76 William G. Dana arrived at Santa Barbara from Boston in 1826. Although he was a relative of the more famous Richard Henry, there was no direct reference to him in Two Years before the Mast, and this has given rise to much interesting speculation. It was said that Richard refused to see William at the time of his visit to Santa Barbara. The reason, apparently, lay in William’s eager espousal of the Roman Catholic faith and Mexican citizenship and his engagement to young Josefa Carrillo of Santa Barbara. It seems probable that Richard, so much more bound to the Calvinist religion, the inherited patriotism, and the racial pride of the family, had his kinsman in mind when he wrote that certain Americans in California had “left their consciences at Cape Horn.” Don Abel Stearns was also the bearer of an old and distinguished Massachusetts family name. He went first to Mexico and had already become naturalized when he arrived in California in 1829. As a prosperous trader in hides and liquors, he was as flagrant a smuggler as were most of his competitors, and yet in 1836 he was appointed síndico, or fiscal agent, of the village of Los Angeles. Nicknamed Cara de Caballo, or Horseface, he was a homely man even before he acquired a scar about the mouth, left by the knife of a disgruntled customer in his store. Nevertheless, his appearance did not prevent his marriage to beautiful Doña Maria Francisca Paula Arcadia Bandini, and with the added influence of his wife’s relatives he began to acquire the estates that soon made him the largest landowner and cattleman and the wealthiest citizen of southern California. He had no children, which was most unusual among those who married “native daughters.” Don Guillermo and Doña Josefa Dana, for example, had 21. The title don, derived from the Latin dominus, or “lord,” was applied in Mexican California to almost any man of more or less substantial means, particularly a landowner. In baptism and naturalization, a foreign first name was officially changed to its Spanish equivalent. In polite address this might also be done unofficially, as in the case of Don Tomás Larkin, one of the few foreign residents who managed to rise to positions of wealth and importance in California without embracing Roman Catholicism, Mexican nationality, and a native daughter. Thomas Oliver Larkin, another Massachusetts Yankee, came to Monterey in 1832 at the suggestion of his half brother, John Cooper, who was already engaged in trade there. One of Larkin’s fellow passengers on the long voyage around the Horn was Rachel Hobson Holmes, on her way to join her husband at Hilo in the Hawaiian Islands. There she discovered that she was a widow, and a few months later Larkin proposed to her by correspondence. A civil marriage ceremony between two non-Catholic foreigners would have been questioned by the Mexican authorities, and consequently the ceremony was performed on board a ship off the Santa Barbara coast. Mrs. Larkin was the first American woman to live in California. Larkin opened a general store at Monterey, and his business as an intermediary between ranchers and traders was soon flourishing remarkably. Larkin had, as Bancroft put it, “no inconvenient veneration for the revenue laws,” and he offered a tempting charge-account system. The chief officials of the province, among others, became heavily indebted to him. He did a thriving business in redwood lumber; and CHAPTER 6 American Infiltration 77 raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 77 78 PART ONE California Beginnings in his designs for his own home, the customs house, and other buildings, he established the “Monterey style” of architecture. These early American immigrants had come by sea and taken up residence in the coastal strip. In addition, there were those who came overland and settled mainly in the interior. The first important settler in this American overland migration was “Dr.” John Marsh. Still another son of Massachusetts, Marsh had graduated from Harvard with the class of 1823. Later he “read medicine” under an army surgeon stationed in Minnesota, but the surgeon died before Marsh had completed the program of study. Following his arrival in Los Angeles in 1836, he secured permission to practice medicine. For credentials he offered his Harvard bachelor of arts diploma, correctly suspecting that he was the only person in the town who could read the Latin in which the diploma was printed. Because his fees were paid almost entirely in cowhides, his little adobe soon resembled a warehouse rather than a medical office. After a few months, in order to purchase a ranch, he sold his stock of hides for $500 and accepted Roman Catholicism and naturalization. Marsh was now a morose and greedy man, determined to acquire wealth in compensation for his many disappointments. In 1837 he bought a huge tract near the Sacramento–San Joaquin Delta at the foot of Mount Diablo. Marsh made it the first successful rancho in the great Central Valley by adopting the system of Indian labor exploitation that flourished on the coastal ranchos of his Spanish-speaking neighbors. The local Indians, probably Miwoks and Northern Valley Yokuts, made the adobe bricks for Marsh’s ranch house and plowed and cultivated his fields. The Indians received no wages for their work, but Marsh fed them beans and beef, gave them a few clothes, and tended to their medical needs. Two years after Marsh settled in the region of the San Joaquin Delta, John Sutter arrived with his ambitious designs for the Sacramento Valley. Sutter, originally Johann August Suter, was a German Swiss, and in the history of the American movement overland into California he and his New Helvetia were to play a significant role. Sutter was a fugitive from tragedy and from justice. In Switzerland he had been married only 1 day before the birth of his first son, and the marriage was unhappy even though it finally produced five children. Sutter always lived extravagantly, and in 1834, faced with debtors’ prison after the failure of his dry goods business, he deserted his family and absconded to America. After interludes elsewhere, he arrived in Monterey in July 1839 and soon set about promoting a grandiose colonization scheme for the Sacramento Valley. In the meantime his powers of romantic imagination had made him “Captain” Sutter, formerly of “the Royal Swiss Guard of France.” Meanwhile, Governor Alvarado and Comandante Vallejo were continuing their quarrel, andAlvarado thought he saw a chance to use Sutter as a check upon Vallejo’s power and pretensions. With the governor’s blessing, Sutter selected a tract on the Sacramento River at its junction with theAmerican.After 1 year, the minimum period of legal residence, the glamorous newcomer received not only Mexican citizenship and a grant of 11 square leagues but also the status of a regional official. He was raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 78 Sutter’s Fort. (Courtesy of the Bancroft Library.) authorized “to function as political authority and dispenser of justice” in order to prevent (among other things) “the robberies committed by adventurers from the United States.” Beginning with beaver pelts and wild-grape brandy, Sutter went on to establish a cattle ranch and farm, using the labor of Indians. Sutter’s herds and fields and vineyards were tended by Indian laborers; all his workshops were staffed by native craftspeople who did the weaving, spinning, tanning, and other tasks. As biographer Albert Hurtado, author of John Sutter and the North American Empire (2006), has concluded “one way or another, Indians were at the heart of all of Sutter’s concerns.” Sutter also succeeded remarkably, for a time, in obtaining credit. In 1841, for example, when the Russian-American Fur Company abandoned Fort Ross, Sutter’s note for $30,000 secured the purchase of its implements and livestock with only $2000 paid down. Several cannons from Ross strengthened the defenses of Sutter’s own fort. That establishment would soon be a focal point for early American overland migration. Covered Wagons, 1841 to 1846 The first organized group to cross the Rockies for the purpose of settlement in California was the Bidwell-Bartleson party of 1841. The previous year, John Marsh had written a letter to some friends in the neighborhood of Independence, Missouri, praising the lands and climate of California and minimizing the difficulty of getting there. Lured by this and other rosy testimonials, more than 500 persons organized a Western Emigration Society and pledged to assemble near Independence in the following spring. During the winter, however, Missouri newspapers circulated stories that painted a sharply different picture. One of these concerned CHAPTER 6 American Infiltration 79 raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 79 80 PART ONE California Beginnings the harsh treatment accorded some Americans at Monterey who, led by distilleryoperator Isaac Graham, had been jailed on suspicion of plotting a revolt against Mexican authority. The news of the episode so discouraged the members of the Western Emigration Society that only one of the original signers appeared at the appointed place in May 1841. This was John Bidwell, a young former schoolteacher. In addition to Bidwell, 68 new prospects appeared. John Bartleson was elected captain, solely because he insisted that otherwise he would not go. As Bidwell later put it, very generously, Bartleson “was not the best man for the position,” but “he had seven or eight men with him, and we did not want the party diminished.” No one in the group had ever been west, and their only maps were ridiculously inaccurate. When the time came to leave the Oregon Trail and strike out across the Great Basin for California, about half the emigrants prudently decided to go on to Oregon, and several others turned back toward Missouri. The rest managed to find the Humboldt River, but had to abandon their wagons. Near the Humboldt Sink, Bartleson and eight other men took the best horses, deserted the party, and rushed on ahead. They failed to find a pass and returned shamefacedly, begging a share of the little food that remained. Bidwell quietly readmitted them to the group. It did not need to be said that he and not Bartleson was now the captain. At the end of October, miraculously, they found their way over the Sierra and down to the Stanislaus, and on November 4, 1841, they arrived at Marsh’s ranch. The miserly Marsh demanded high prices for supplies. By contrast, when Bidwell visited Sutter’s Fort a few weeks later, he was cordially welcomed, as nearly all newcomers were. Sutter was the emigrant’s benefactor and friend. New Helvetia was to be the headquarters for several rescue parties sent to help stranded travelers over the Sierra. The overland migrants not only received the benefits of Sutter’s hospitality, they also witnessed at New Helvetia a working model of what could be accomplished with a labor force of California Indians. Few travelers who visited Sutter failed to be impressed by the apparent ease—and “the occasional exercise of well-timed authority”—with which he had subdued his Indian workers. In the fall of 1841, an emigrant party including William Workman, John Rowland, and Benjamin D. Wilson traveled from Santa Fé to Los Angeles. In 1843 Lansford W. Hastings, a frontier lawyer with filibustering ambitions, led a group into California from Oregon. Several of its members, including Hastings, had the perverted desire to shoot down an Indian, and the unprovoked murders they committed in the upper Sacramento Valley stored up trouble for them and for future pioneers. The Stephens-Townsend-Murphy party, coming from Missouri in 1844, was the first to succeed in getting wagons over the Sierra, and also the first to make use of what would later be the main route, the Donner Pass, though that name was not acquired until the tragedy that was to follow 2 years later. The year 1845 saw the beginning of a somewhat more substantial annual migration. Reports from Thomas O. Larkin, John Marsh, and John C. Frémont were stirring up interest in California. Lansford W. Hastings, through speech making and the publication of his dangerously misleading Emigrant’s Guide, was pursuing his dream of leading hordes of Americans to the western paradise, and hoping that their gratitude would make him a new Sam Houston, president of a Pacific republic or raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 80 governor of a new American state. The largest emigrant party of 1845, the GrigsbyIde group, had more than 100 members, and the total for the year was more than 250 persons. More than twice as many came in 1846. The worse-than-worthless advice of Lansford W. Hastings was a cause of dangerous delays for many of them, and it led the Donner party into the worst disaster in the history of the California Trail. The Donner party was organized at Springfield, Illinois. It passed through Independence on time, in May, but instead of taking the established route north of the Great Salt Lake, it followed “Hastings’ Cutoff” to the south of it. Winter set in early. On November 2 the main party decided to rest overnight only a few miles short of the Sierra summit. That night a snowstorm blocked the pass. Most of the party was snowed in near Donner Lake until February, and many survived only by eating the flesh of the dead. Of 87 persons in the original group, 40 perished. There was heroism as well as horror. James Reed left the party to bring back provisions and returned leading a relief expedition from Sutter’s Fort. During his absence, the family of Patrick and Margaret Breen took in two of Reed’s children and cared for them along with their own seven children. When rescuers arrived, Tamsen Donner refused to leave her husband, George, who was too weak to travel. Their three daughters were saved, but George and Tamsen died. Alfred Robinson had written to Larkin urging all possible efforts to publicize California so that “the American population will be sufficiently large to play the Texas game” and overthrow Mexican rule prior to annexation by the United States. But California before the gold rush was less attractive to American settlers than either Texas or Oregon; the emigrants to California were primarily interested in trying to advance their own fortunes rather than their country’s, and many were so discouraged that they drifted north to Oregon or back to “the States.” Whatever their intentions, the American infiltrators were stirring considerable apprehension among the authorities in California. After the arrival of the first overland party in 1841, Mariano Guadalupe Vallejo warned that “if the invasion which is taking place from all sides” continues, the Mexican citizens of California “will be replaced by or dominated by another race.” Although Vallejo later adopted a more favorable view, he lamented the prospect of seeing “the treasure being stolen” and predicted that the proud Californios will fight to “preserve their noble attitude of free men while a drop of blood remains in their veins, and will bite the dust before kissing the enemy’s hand.” Vallejo’s warnings were not unfounded. Overland emigration in the 1840s was laying the ground for eventual American sovereignty. It had not yet accomplished this by 1846, but other related historical forces had been set in motion. Selected Bibliography Adele Ogden’s The California Sea Otter Trade (1937) remains the classic treatment of its subject. See also Magdalen Coughlin, “Boston Smugglers on the Coast,” California Historical Society Quarterly, XLVI (June 1967), pp. 99–120. The hide and tallow trade is described in Richard Henry Dana, Two Years before the Mast (1840, with many reprintings); CHAPTER 6 American Infiltration 81 raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 81 82 PART ONE California Beginnings Alfred Robinson, Life in California (1846); and Doyce B. Nunis, Jr. (ed.), The California Diary of Faxon Dean Atherton (1964). The story of the beaver trappers and traders is told in Richard Batman, James Ohio Pattie’s West (1986) and James Clyman, Journal of a Mountain Man, edited by Linda M. Hasselstrom (1984). Robert G. Cleland’s This Reckless Breed of Men (1952) remains readable and reliable. Dale L. Morgan’s Jedediah Smith and the Opening of the West (1953) is a brilliant biography; see also Barton H. Barbour, Jedediah Smith (2009) and David J. Weber, The Californios versus Jedediah Smith (1990). LeRoy R. Hafen (ed.), The Mountain Men and the Fur Trade of the Far West (10 volumes, 1971), provides 300 biographical sketches. On American and other immigrants to California before 1849, both by sea and by land, an indispensable source is the “Pioneer Register,” an alphabetical biographical dictionary appended to volumes II–V of the Bancroft History of California. A group portrait appears in Charles B. Churchill, Adventurers and Prophets (1995). The story of the most prominent Anglo-American in the province is well told in Harlan Hague and David J. Langum, Thomas O. Larkin (1990). Crucial to an understanding of the period is Albert L. Hurtado’s richly interpretive John Sutter and the North American Empire (2006). See also the critical essays in Kenneth N. Owens (ed.), John Sutter and a Wider West (1994) and Allan R. Ottley (ed.), John A. Sutter’s Last Days (1986). Good accounts of the overland migration are in Will Bagley, So Rugged and Mountainous (2010); Michael J. Gillis and Michael F. Magliari, John Bidwell and California (2004); John D. Unruh, Jr., The Plains Across (1979); George R. Stewart, The California Trail (1962); and Irving Stone, Men to Match My Mountains (1956). For a biography of the founder of Stockton, see James Shebl’s lively Weber! (1993). On the Donner tragedy, see Ethan Rarick, Desperate Passage (2008); Kristin Johnson, Unfortunate Emigrants (1996); Jeannette G. Maino, Left Hand Turn (1987); the enduring George R. Stewart, Ordeal by Hunger (1936); and the imaginative reconstruction by James D. Houston in Snow Mountain Passage (2001). raw06961_ch06_072-082.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 82 83 PART TWO The Rush for Riches Aclash of national ambitions led to lethal conflict between Mexico and the United States in the mid-1840s. Diplomatic overtures and covert intrigues preceded the call to arms, and at war’s end a treaty transferred sovereignty over California from one nation to the other.
Just a few days before the signing of the treaty, in one of those strange coincidences in American history, gold was discovered in the lands newly acquired by the United States. News of the momentous discovery soon spread around the globe, and California burst upon the consciousness of the world as a land of golden opportunity. California’s population boomed as eager gold seekers arrived from the eastern United States, Latin America, Europe, Asia, and the islands of the Pacific. The gold discovery was a powerful stimulus to economic development, jump-starting a host of enterprises. A lucky few made fortunes; others were bitterly disappointed. Rapid growth and extraordinary diversity presented California with a daunting challenge. Social conditions were unstable and chaotic. Political authority was confused and ineffectual. Impatient Californians formed a new state government, elected public officials, and indulged in the lamentable practice of vigilantism. In their attempts to establish law and order, they vented their frustrations and prejudices in discriminatory public policies; the attendant ethnic conflict created fissures and tensions that remain with us still. Meanwhile, a cultural florescence, fueled by talented journalists and writers, managed to transform the anarchy of the gold rush into art. “Portrait of Miners.” A daguerreotype from the California gold rush, c. 1850. (Courtesy of the California Historical Society, FN-25814.) raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 83 84 The American Conquest In 1846 the United States declared war on Mexico, and during the course of that war American military forces occupied California. At war’s end in 1848, the two nations negotiated a treaty in which Mexico ceded California and other borderland provinces to the United States. These events constitute a watershed in California history: the Mexican War and subsequent transfer of title stand as a great discontinuity in the state’s history. Overtures, Diplomatic and Undiplomatic Official American efforts to acquire California had an inauspicious beginning in 1835, as an extension of President Andrew Jackson’s plans for the purchase of Texas. These schemes originated largely in the fertile brain of Colonel Anthony Butler, an old friend of Jackson, to whom the president had unwisely entrusted the ministry to Mexico. Butler disgraced himself and his government by letting it be known in Mexico City that he expected to purchase the republic’s northern territories by buying some of its political leaders. When Butler later tried to implicate Jackson in his schemes for bribery, Old Hickory denounced him as a liar. President Jackson was interested in California mainly because the acquisition of San Francisco Bay, as a port for American trade in the Pacific, might reconcile northern commercial interests to the annexation of Texas as a slave state. Jackson in 1837 unsuccessfully offered $3.5 million for Mexican recognition of a southwestern boundary of the United States extending along the Rio Grande and thence westward to the Pacific along the 38th parallel. He was unaware that this line would have left the entrance to San Francisco Bay about 12 miles south of the border. The panic of 1837 began a few weeks after the inauguration of Martin Van Buren, Jackson’s chosen successor. Van Buren’s single term as president was one long period of depression in which the Treasury was in no condition to provide for CHAPTER 7 raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 84 CHAPTER 7 The American Conquest 85 purchasing new territory. With economic recovery in the 1840s, the United States began to assert its manifest destiny to extend its borders to the Pacific. Manifest destiny was the belief in the clear inevitability and righteousness of the nation’s continued territorial expansion across the continent. Early in the John Tyler administration, Daniel Webster as secretary of state and Waddy Thompson as minister to Mexico advocated a plan to secure California in exchange for cancellation of American financial claims against the Mexican government. But again, as in the Anthony Butler episode, an American blunder raised an outcry in Mexico City that made any peaceful cession of territory to the United States politically impossible. Early in September 1842, Commodore Thomas ap Catesby Jones, commander of the American Pacific squadron, received a false report at Callao, Peru, that the United States and Mexico were at war and that Mexico intended to cede California to Great Britain rather than see it fall into American hands. The British Pacific squadron had just left Callao, reportedly under sealed orders from England. Jones, who had received instructions in Washington a year earlier to act quickly in just such an eventuality, promptly sailed for California in what he supposed to be a race with the British. He anchored at Monterey on October 18 and on the next day demanded its peaceful surrender. This was concluded on the 20th, the American flag was raised, and Jones marched his men ashore six abreast to the tunes of “The Star-Spangled Banner” and “Yankee Doodle.” He also proclaimed California under armed but courteous and benevolent American occupation. This proclamation remained in force only 1 day. On the 21st, when Jones landed in person and examined the latest official communications from Mexico, he realized that he had been completely and regrettably misinformed. Commodore Jones may have viewed the raising of the American flag as an act of benevolence—as “an emblem of civil liberty”—but the Californios viewed it quite differently. Customs administrator Antonio María Osio bitterly recalled being forced to witness “a painful ceremony”: The national flag [of Mexico] was lowered from its native flagpole so that it could be replaced by the stars and stripes. This flag was alleged to be the symbol of liberty, but that was actually a lie. It belonged to an oppressor who displayed arrogance against the weak. Governor Manuel Micheltorena, who was then in LosAngeles, immediately began to organize resistance, urging all Californios to take up arms to defend their territory. When Micheltorena received a letter of explanation and apology from Jones, the governor advised Jones to come to him at LosAngeles. There he received the commodore and his explanations with courtesy and hospitality, but sent reports to Mexico City in an entirely different tone. The Mexican government conveyed an angry protest to Washington demanding extreme punishment for Jones, but although the United States disavowed his actions, he suffered only a temporary removal from his command. As the Jones incident clearly shows, American suspicions of the designs of Great Britain on California played a large part in American thinking, and incidentally provided a very useful rationalization of American plans. The fact was that Her Majesty’s government had no intention whatever of trying to acquire California. There were outward appearances of a designing nature, however, quite sufficient to supply fuel for raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 85 86 PART TWO The Rush for Riches American fears. In 1841, for example, Sir George Simpson of the Hudson’s Bay Company visited California and concluded quite correctly that some native Californians were so afraid of American control that they would welcome a British protectorate. Sir George’s enthusiasm for such a development was obvious, and Americans had no way of knowing that the British government did not support his views. The French, also, had some degree of interest in California dating all the way back to the visit of the comte de La Pérouse. In 1842 the French agent Eugène Duflot de Mofras reported that California was certain to pass to some power other than Mexico, and soon. French hopes were faint, based on little more than the idea that Mexico might prefer to see California in the friendly hands of a Latin and Catholic nation rather than under Anglo-Saxon Protestants. The weakness of Mexican control of California had been so apparent to any observer for so long that a spate of foreign designs was inevitable. Plans of the Polk Administration James K. Polk of Tennessee was a political disciple of Andrew Jackson, who lived to congratulate Polk on his inauguration as president in March 1845. Polk, like his mentor, was always ready to believe any rumors of fell designs on the part of the British. Polk also shared some of the anti-British views of Senator Thomas Hart Benton of Missouri, powerful chairman of the Senate military affairs committee. Benton firmly though incorrectly believed that perfidious Albion had intended to acquire California ever since Drake claimed and named New Albion in 1579. On coming into office, President Polk confided to Secretary of the Navy George Bancroft that the acquisition of California would be one of his most cherished goals. Within the month of Polk’s inauguration, Governor Micheltorena and his troops were virtually deported from California, and this ended the last desperate effort to assert any effective control over the province from Mexico City. When the news of this development reached the east coast in June 1845, a chorus of newspaper editorials began to call for American acquisition. During this same period, Polk received reports from Mexico City of the startling proposal of a young Irish priest named Eugene McNamara to bring 10,000 colonists to California. McNamara gained the approval of the archbishop of Mexico, and addressed a burning appeal to the Mexican president in which he warned that “before another year the Californias will form a part of the American Nation. Their Catholic institutions will become the prey of the Methodist wolves; and the whole country will be inundated with these cruel invaders.” The McNamara scheme was wildly impracticable, but many Americans regarded it with true alarm as being somehow simultaneously a British and a popish plot. Having determined to acquire California, Polk would have preferred to purchase it. He sent John Slidell on an unsuccessful mission to Mexico with an offer of as much as $40 million for Upper California and New Mexico. “Money,” said Slidell’s instructions, “would be no object when compared with the value of this acquisition.” This was Polk’s own view, but he was well aware that the prospects of success were raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 86 CHAPTER 7 The American Conquest 87 dim, and therefore he put an alternative plan into operation simultaneously. This involved secret instructions to Thomas O. Larkin, consul at Monterey since the previous year, to try to persuade the Californians to secede from Mexico and seek American protection. Larkin had been highly successful in his business pursuits in California, but his sympathies were not with the Californios. He also took great pride in the fact that his were the first children born in California of parents who both had been born in the United States. He had been reporting to Washington every suspicion and rumor of sinister British intentions toward California, and in some instances he seems to have exaggerated his reports beyond what he himself believed, so great was his yearning for American annexation at this time. On October 17, 1845, a secret dispatch signed by James Buchanan, the secretary of state, appointed Larkin “confidential agent in California.” He was instructed to warn the Californians against any attempt to bring them under the jurisdiction of “Foreign Governments.” Further, he was to “arouse in their bosoms that love of liberty and independence so natural to the American Continent.” Should California assert and maintain her independence, Buchanan wrote to Larkin, “we shall render her all the kind offices in our power as a Sister Republic.” The plan had real possibilities. Larkin was on friendly terms with officials at Monterey, whom he had supplied for years with most of their provisions and merchandise. The government had reached a state of truly insufferable confusion, and almost everyone admitted the need for some decisive change. Since the departure of Micheltorena, the capital and the assembly had been at Los Angeles under Don Pío Pico as governor, while the customs and the treasury remained at Monterey, with Colonel José Castro as military commander. Mariano Guadalupe Vallejo had become reconciled to American annexation because he considered it both inevitable and preferable to the alternatives. Colonel Castro, though he bristled at any suggestion of American military force, was confidentially circulating a plan for “declaring California independent in 1847–1848, as soon as a sufficient number of foreigners should arrive.” Larkin also enlisted the cooperation of Jacob P. Leese of Sonoma, Don Abel Stearns of Los Angeles, and J. J. Warner from near San Diego, and all three became not only active in the scheme, but also convinced that it would work. The promising Polk-Larkin plan for winning the province by peaceful conciliation of the paisanos was impeded by resentment of the blustering actions of Captain John C. Frémont in California in March 1846. A few weeks later, the plan was entirely nullified by the Bear Flag Revolt—in which Frémont also had a part—and by the outbreak of the Mexican War. John Charles Frémont Frémont was one of the most controversial figures not only in the history of California but in the history of the United States as well. His mother, the young wife of a wealthy and elderly citizen of Richmond, had run away with a young French raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 87 John Charles Frémont (1813–1890), an impulsive participant in the Bear Flag Revolt. (Courtesy of the Bancroft Library.) 88 PART TWO The Rush for Riches émigré. In Virginia a divorce could be obtained only from the state legislature, which refused to pass the necessary act. Frémont’s parents lived together as husband and wife until the death of the father, which occurred when John Charles was 5 years old. The circumstances of his birth seem to have given him, as in the analogous case of Alexander Hamilton, a feeling of extraordinary need to establish his place in the world. He was like the young Hamilton, too, in that his promising qualities attracted the sympathy of influential men who helped him gain an education. But there was also a side of Frémont’s personality that made him impulsive, unstable, and erratic throughout his life. He was ever the impatient opportunist and adventurer, and there was hardly a single action of his whole career that did not produce some troublesome set of complications—and interminable disagreement among biographers and historians about his motives and conduct. As a lieutenant in the Corps of Topographical Engineers, Frémont met Senator Thomas Hart Benton, who inspired the younger man with his own fiery enthusiasm for the vast possibilities of westward exploration and expansion and with his dream of extending American territory to the Pacific. At Benton’s home Frémont met the senator’s daughter Jessie, an extraordinary girl of 16 whose great intellectual gifts had been developed by her father’s intensive and devoted tutoring. Frémont and Jessie were secretly married a few months later, and after stormy protests, Benton was reconciled to the marriage. Frémont gained a brilliant and beautiful wife and a brilliant and influential father-in-law, and both became his invaluable allies. Frémont then led a series of western exploring and scientific expeditions, authorized by Congress at the prompting of Senator Benton. The first of these followed the raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 88 CHAPTER 7 The American Conquest 89 Oregon Trail as far as South Pass in the Rockies. The final report of this expedition— combining Frémont’s own genius for publicity with his wife’s sparkling literary style—was widely circulated and established Frémont as a national hero. His second expedition, in 1843–1844, proceeded across the Sierra Nevada into California. There was a temporary flurry over Frémont’s setting out with a howitzer, which the War Department had specifically ordered him not to take on the grounds that the expedition was supposed to be scientific and not military. It had to be explained that Jessie Frémont had intercepted this dispatch and had taken it upon herself to suppress it, but her father defended this action successfully in the Senate. With the second expedition already well publicized, the Frémonts’ collaborative prose soon described it in even more fascinating terms than the first. Understandably the report was another best-seller and became the most widely read description of the far west. In Washington, D.C., in the spring of 1845, Frémont became convinced that war with Mexico was imminent, that his third expedition should be prepared for military rather than merely scientific activities, and that with it he should play an important role in conquering California. In this idea he received some private encouragement from Senator Benton and from Secretary of the Navy Bancroft. There is no evidence, however, that Frémont received authorization for military operations in Mexican territory either from President Polk or from the War Department. Nevertheless, he recruited 60 armed men, all expert marksmen, and arrived in California in December 1845. Early in 1846, Frémont appeared at Monterey. He had come, he said, merely to survey a route to the Pacific, and his men were not soldiers. Colonel Castro, however, peremptorily ordered Frémont and his armed force out of California. In angry and headstrong defiance, Frémont entrenched his men on Hawk’s Peak (now Frémont Peak) in the Gabilán Mountains overlooking the Salinas Valley and raised the American flag. Castro called for volunteers and raised a force of about 200. Larkin mediated, and Frémont, after 3 days on his mountaintop, retreated to the Sacramento Valley. Obviously playing for time, he moved slowly northward—“slowly and growlingly,” as he put it in a letter to his wife. On May 9, 1846, he was overtaken near Klamath Lake in southern Oregon by Lieutenant Archibald H. Gillespie of the Marine Corps, who had come to California disguised as a merchant traveling for his health, under instructions from Polk and Buchanan to cooperate as a secret agent with Larkin in the plan of peaceful persuasion. Gillespie, like Frémont, was a rash and high-spirited young man. Arriving in California in April, he had heard reports that war with Mexico was imminent, and these reports he brought to Frémont along with a packet of letters from Senator Benton. The two young officers seem to have convinced each other that the plan for peaceful conciliation was now out of date, that bold initiative was called for, and that Frémont’s force should return to California prepared for military action. Whether Gillespie brought Frémont any secret official authorization to proceed in this way has been hotly debated. There is no reliable documentary evidence for this claim. Frémont probably acted, as he had already acted several weeks earlier at raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 89 90 PART TWO The Rush for Riches Hawk’s Peak, on his own imagination of what the interests of the United States required him to do under particular circumstances. Thus, his own ambitions and impulses had free rein. The Bear Flag Revolt In the meantime, a crop of frightening rumors had circulated among the American immigrants recently settled in the Sacramento and Napa valleys. Frémont and his men had spread some of these rumors on their way northward. In particular, it was falsely reported that Colonel Castro would soon follow up his expulsion of Frémont with an expulsion of all the American settlers. The origins of the Bear Flag Revolt are unclear, and the evidence, especially on Frémont’s part in it, is often contradictory. The American settlers in the area were a miscellaneous group of people in a very insecure situation. Nearly all of them were rough pioneers. Some were roving hunters and trappers, or runaway sailors. Most were squatters who probably believed the rumors that they would soon be attacked and driven out of California. Emboldened by the return of Frémont, on June 10 a group under the rough-and-ready Ezekiel Merritt began the revolt by seizing a herd of horses intended for Castro’s militia. Some further and more formal action was needed, lest the rebels remain merely horse thieves. Thus, on the morning of Sunday, June 14, a party of more than 30 armed settlers descended on the village of Sonoma. There were no longer any soldiers at this former military post, and Colonel Vallejo was no longer on active duty, but the filibusters surrounded his home and informed him that he was a prisoner of war. He invited the leaders in to explain what war he was a prisoner of, and when this proved a difficult question, he brought out bottles of aguardiente, or brandy, to aid in the discussion. The rest waited outside for several hours and then elected someone to go in and investigate. After another interval, they sent in William B. Ide, who, according to his own account, found the previous commissioners befuddled by Vallejo’s brandy. Ide, a teetotaler, finally arranged the terms of capitulation, with Jacob P. Leese, Vallejo’s brother-in-law, acting as translator. The capitulation was written in English, but Vallejo added a paragraph in Spanish that explained his motives for surrender. Genaro Padilla, author of My History, Not Yours (1993), has interpreted this paragraph as a symbol of Vallejo’s resistance “within a confined, and dangerous, rhetorical space.” Colonel Vallejo was probably the most widely respected citizen of California. He had no objection to being arrested because, as an advocate of American annexation, he was thus relieved of his embarrassing trust as a Mexican officer. The sensible course would have been to parole him, and he was given some assurance that this would be done, but instead he was taken under arrest to Sutter’s Fort. Frémont, who then placed the fort virtually under his own command, committed the foolish outrage of ordering Vallejo into a cell, where he was imprisoned for 2 months. Frémont, feeling that Castro had humiliated him, now acted as if it were Castro and not Vallejo who was his prisoner. He sternly reprimanded Sutter for trying to make Vallejo’s bare cell more comfortable. The outrageous actions of Frémont and raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 90 Replica of the original Bear Flag, raised over the Sonoma plaza in 1846. Critics later complained that the grizzly looked more like a pig than a bear. (Courtesy of James Vanderbilt, Sonoma Valley Historical Society.) CHAPTER 7 The American Conquest 91 his men deeply embittered the Californios. Vallejo’s daughter Rosalía later said that “those hated men” inspired within her “a large dose of hatred” against the Americans. Likewise ranchero José María Amadór expressed deep misgivings: “The bear flag and the presumptuous revolt it symbolized showed the Californios that independence would likely translate into Yankee domination in one form or another.” At Sonoma, Ide and his associates declared themselves a republic and devised a flag. It was a piece of white cotton cloth with a star and a stripe. In the upper left-hand corner, a large lone star, obviously suggesting an analogy with the history of Texas, was painted in red. To the right of the star, and facing it, was what was intended as a grizzly bear, passant. Under these emblems, “CALIFORNIA REPUBLIC.” was lettered in black ink. Abroad stripe of red flannel, made from an article of used clothing, variously recalled as either a petticoat or a man’s shirt, was sewn along the bottom of the cotton. This was the original of the banner which the California Legislature adopted in 1911 as the state flag and which since then must be flown over all state buildings. In later years Ide and Frémont made rival claims, both considerably exaggerated, for credit in the matter of the Bear Flag Revolt. Frémont’s connection with its beginning was highly equivocal and opportunistic. He helped to foment the rebellion by encouraging the American settlers to goad the Californios into attacking them so that he and his men could come to their defense. Castro sent about 50 men northward across San Francisco Bay to try to retake Sonoma. On June 24, there was a skirmish north of San Rafael, later magnified into the “battle of Olompali.” In the entire “Bear Flag war,” two Americans and five or six Californios were killed. Frémont, having now assumed command of the Bear Flaggers and having informally merged his force with theirs, crossed from the Marin peninsula on July 1. raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 91 92 PART TWO The Rush for Riches Entering the long-ungarrisoned little ruin of the San Francisco presidio, he spiked its 10 old Spanish guns. This was a typically Frémontian act—dashing in appearance but superfluous in reality. Those venerable cannons were incapable of firing so much as a salute. In a more notable and enduring achievement, described in his Memoirs, Frémont gave the entrance to the bay “the name of Chrysopylae, or Golden Gate, for the same reasons that the harbor of Constantinople was called Chryoceros, or Golden Horn.” Frémont joined a Fourth of July celebration at Sonoma, and the next day he more or less formally organized the “California battalion” of American volunteers, with himself in command and Lieutenant Gillespie as adjutant. On the 7th, however, Commodore Sloat raised the American flag at Monterey. It was raised at Yerba Buena and Sonoma on the 9th and replaced the Bear Flag at Sutter’s Fort on the 11th. The life of the Bear Flag “republic,” a rather romantic and later fantastically romanticized period of a little less than a month, was thus ended. By instigating the Bear Flag Revolt, and by participating in it, Frémont actually accomplished only two things. One was an unnecessary embitterment of feelings between Americans and Californios, in violation of the U.S. government’s policy and best interests. The other was an enhancement of his own somewhat spurious popular reputation as a patriot and hero. The Mexican War and California The causes of the Mexican War were complex and are still disputed. Only a brief sketch of its general background is necessary here. In the 10 years since the establishment of the Republic of Texas in 1836, Mexico had never recognized it as independent. In February 1845 the American Congress passed a joint resolution inviting Texas to join the American Union. Mexico regarded the prospective American annexation of Texas as a hostile act and broke off diplomatic relations with the United States, threatening war but not declaring it. Mexico was particularly bitter at the claim of Texas that its southern boundary was the Rio Grande, rather than the Nueces River, some distance to the north. On April 7, 1846, President Polk learned of Mexico’s refusal to receive diplomat John Slidell (and his ill-fated mission to purchase Mexican territory). The next day General Zachary Taylor was ordered to cross the Nueces and occupy the disputed zone. Soon several Americans were killed in skirmishes with Mexican troops. With this news in hand, Polk asked Congress to declare that a state of war existed by hostile action of Mexico. Congress did so, and Polk signed the declaration on May 13, 1846. The president recorded in his diary that his purpose now was “to acquire for the United States” California and other provinces of Mexico. Several months earlier, Secretary of the Navy Bancroft had instructed Commodore John D. Sloat of the Pacific squadron that in the event of war with Mexico he was to occupy such ports in California as he considered necessary for the establishment of American authority in the province. In June, at Mazatlán, Sloat received definite but still unofficial reports that the United States and Mexico were at raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 92 The western boundary of the United States in 1826. The Treaty of Guadalupe Hidelgo at the end of the Mexican War (1846–1848) redefined the boundary and substantially reduced the size of Mexico. (Courtesy of the Library of Congress, Geography and Map Division.) CHAPTER 7 The American Conquest 93 war. On July 2 he anchored at Monterey but hesitated lest he repeat the embarrassing mistake of Commodore Jones. He offered to fire a salute to the Mexican flag, an honor which the port authorities declined because they lacked the powder to return it. The presidio at Monterey had three guns, all of different caliber, and the California navy consisted of one small vessel with no guns. After 5 days’ delay, Sloat made up for his hesitancy on July 7 by issuing a proclamation that went so far as to declare that “henceforward California will be a portion of the United States.” Although he came “in arms with a powerful force,” it was not as an enemy to the people of California but “as their best friend.” He painted a glowing picture of the benefits that would follow, including greater political freedom and stability, honest and efficient administration, and “a great increase in the value of real estate.” Governor Pío Pico responded on July 16 with an order that all citizens of California, both naturalized and nativeborn, must take up arms against the invaders; Colonel José Castro exhorted his countrymen “to give to the entire world an example of loyalty and firmness, maintaining in your breasts the unfailing love of liberty, and eternal hatred toward your invaders!” Sloat on July 23 turned over his command to Commodore Robert F. Stockton, and the tone of the occupation changed sharply. Stockton, like Frémont and Gillespie, was eager to distinguish himself by vigorous action. As one of his first acts raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 93 94 PART TWO The Rush for Riches after assuming command, Stockton mustered the “California Battalion of Mounted Riflemen” into United States service (apparently the naval service, though this has never really been clear), commissioning Frémont as major and Gillespie as captain. Stockton then issued a new, bombastic, and offensive proclamation to the people, drawn up with the advice of Frémont and Gillespie. Colonel Castro at Santa Clara and Governor Pico at Los Angeles, in spite of their earlier impassioned calls to arms, concluded that resistance was hopeless, and both left for Mexico. In August, Los Angeles was occupied without resistance. Stockton was now able to announce that California was “entirely free from Mexican dominion,” but he irritated the Angeleños by unnecessarily ordering martial law, and then made the further mistake of leaving Gillespie in charge with a small garrison. The inhabitants of Los Angeles were not accustomed to strict maintenance of order, and Gillespie’s rules were oppressive and arbitrary. The order for a curfew, for example, was highly unrealistic. When some of the more disorderly elements behaved with their customary exuberance, Gillespie began to treat them as rebels before they had actually thought of rebellion. They soon thought of it, and Captain José María Flores and several other officers led a revolt that spread rapidly throughout southern California. On September 24, Gillespie was besieged on Fort Hill near the Los Angeles plaza, but his courier managed to get through to inform Stockton at San Francisco. Soon afterward Gillespie surrendered under terms that permitted him to march his men to San Pedro for embarkation. At San Pedro, however, they met a relief force of marines and sailors who had arrived from San Francisco and who now joined them for a march back toward Los Angeles. The way was hot and dusty, and the Americans traveled on foot because the rebels had rounded up all the horses in the region. About 15 miles inland, at Domínguez Rancho on October 8, the Americans encountered a force led by José Antonio Carrillo, well-mounted and equipped with a surprisingly effective cannon. This had long been used to fire salutes at the Los Angeles plaza on festive occasions. Before the town’s surrender to Stockton, it had been buried in the garden of Señora Inocencia Reyes. Dug up and lashed to the running gear of a wagon, it proved a deadly weapon, and the “battle of the Old Woman’s Gun” was a brilliant victory for the Californios. The Americans suffered a number of casualties and withdrew to San Pedro, leaving Los Angeles in rebel hands for 3 months more. As María de la Guerra observed, “the taking of the country did not please the Californios at all, and least of all the women.” In June, at Fort Leavenworth, General Stephen Watts Kearny had received instructions from the secretary of war to occupy New Mexico and then proceed to California to organize a military and civil government there. Kearny occupied Santa Fé without resistance and set out for California with 300 dragoons. On the way, unfortunately, he met Kit Carson, whom Stockton had sent eastward in August with the premature news that California was peacefully and firmly in American hands. Kearny sent most of his force back and continued with only about 100 men. When raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 94 A romanticized depiction of the battle of San Pasqual, 1846. The figure shrouded in smoke beneath the American flag is presumably General Kearny, wounded in battle. Note the lances of the charging Californios. (Courtesy of the California Historical Society, FN-12646.) CHAPTER 7 The American Conquest 95 they reached southern California, they had come 2000 miles in one of the longest and most difficult marches in U.S. Army history. They were exhausted and halfstarved, and most of their mounts had been worn out and replaced with mules or unbroken horses. Several hours before dawn on December 6, Kearny was encamped near the Indian village of San Pasqual, about 35 miles northeast of San Diego, when he learned that a rebel detachment was in the village. Carson assured him that the Californians were cowards who would not and could not fight. Hoping to capture the rebels’ horses, Kearny roused his men for an immediate advance in the darkness, cold, and fog. The wretched mounts of the dragoons moved with varying speeds, and the rebels, under Andrés Pico, lured them into a pursuit until they were strung out, then suddenly turned to attack them. The American cavalry sabers were hopelessly ineffective against the Californian lances, wielded by men whom Kearny well described as “admirably mounted and the very best riders in the world; hardly one that is not fit for the circus.” Practically all the casualties were on the American side—22 killed, including several officers, and 16 wounded, among them Kearny himself. In spite of their impressive achievements on the battlefield, the rebels were weakened by the usual chronic dissensions, by a shortage of powder, and by their gradual abandonment of hope that they could hold out until Mexico should be victorious over the United States in the main theaters of war. A joint force under Stockton and Kearny recaptured Los Angeles on January 10, 1847, after minor skirmishes. raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 95 Andrés Pico (1810–1876), commander of the Californios at the battle of San Pasqual. (Courtesy of the Seaver Center for Western History Research, Los Angeles County Museum of Natural History.) 96 PART TWO The Rush for Riches Flores now fled to Sonora, and Andrés Pico chose to surrender the rebel forces to Frémont, who had reached the San Fernando Valley from the north. Frémont was flattered at being the officer who now received the final surrender, and by the terms of the Capitulation of Cahuenga on January 13, 1847, he extended full pardon to all the rebels. The surrender at Cahuenga ended organized resistance to the American occupation. It also marked the beginning of a series of bitter disputes over the question of who was now in command and who was authorized to act as military and civil governor. Commodore Stockton still considered himself in charge, and before sailing for further operations on the west coast of Mexico, he appointed Frémont his successor as governor of California. General Kearny refused to recognize this appointment and regarded Frémont as under his own command. Frémont was able to persuade himself that the authority he had received from a commodore in the Navy should prevail over the orders of a brigadier general in the Army who was now his own immediate superior. On this basis Frémont rashly assumed the powers of governor and repeatedly defied military orders from General Kearny. Frémont’s defiance of authority led to a court-martial in which he was found guilty of disobedience of orders and sentenced to dismissal from the service. President Polk approved the verdict but remitted the penalty. Bitterly, Frémont refused this executive clemency and resigned his commission. Popular opinion generally supported Frémont. In the eyes of the American people in the 1840s, insubordination was not a very serious offense. raw06961_ch07_083-097.qxd 12/24/10 7:33 AM Page 96 CHAPTER 7 The American Conquest 97 The war with Mexico was concluded on February 2, 1848, with the signing of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo in which Mexico ceded California and other territories to the United States. At the war’s end, the land area of Mexico was reduced by half. “The armed conflict occurred for many reasons,” historian Manuel Gonzales has concluded, “but mostly because Americans wanted war, or rather what war would provide. The naked truth remains that Mexico had what its northern neighbor craved—land.” Unknown to the signers of the treaty, only 9 days earlier gold had been discovered in the foothills of the Sierra Nevada. Knowledge of the discovery could have made little difference in the negotiations in any event. Mexico had been overrun by American troops and was in no position to quibble over terms of peace, even though California would now be considerably more valuable than it had yet appeared to be. Selected Bibliography Gary F. Kurutz and W. Michael Mathes, The Forgotten War: The Conflict Between Mexico and the United States, 1846–1849 (2004), is a masterful bibliography. Neal Harlow, California Conquered (1982), analyzes American interest in California and the reasons for the American victory. Manuel Gonzales, Mexicanos (1999), and Norman A. Graebner, “The Mexican War: A Study in Causation,” Pacific Historical Review, XLIX (August 1980), pp. 405–426, conclude that force was necessary for the United States to accomplish its designs on California. For a broad overview, see Jack K. Bauer, The Mexican War (1993). Genaro Padilla, My History, Not Yours (1993), is richly interpretive. Earlier American projects for peaceful acquisition are described in Harlan Hague and David J. Langum, Thomas O. Larkin (1990); Graebner, Empire on the Pacific (1955); and Frederick Merk, Manifest Destiny and Mission in American History (1963). See especially A. Brooke Caruso, The Mexican Spy Company: United States Covert Operations in Mexico, 1845–1848 (1991). On rival aspirations, see John Fox, McNamara’s Irish Colony (1999); Merk, The Monroe Doctrine and American Expansionism (1966); and Gene A. Smith, “The War That Wasn’t: Thomas ap Catesby Jones’s Seizure of Monterey,” California History, LXVI (June 1987), pp. 104–114. The first major biography of Frémont, byAllan Nevins, was generally sympathetic. The first edition of this work bore the title Frémont, the West’s Greatest Adventurer (two volumes, 1928). Bernard De Voto, in The Year of Decision, 1846 (1942), deplored all adulation of Frémont, past, present, and future. But Irving Stone, with the license of the novelist, exalted Jessie and her husband in Immortal Wife (1944); a more balanced appraisal appears in Pamela Herr, Jessie Benton Frémont (1987). See also Kenneth M. Johnson, The Frémont Court Martial (1968). Ferol Egan’s Frémont (1977) is lively and engaging, but Andrew Rolle’s John Charles Frémont (1991) is more analytical. Mary Lee Spence and Donald Jackson (eds.), The Expeditions of John Charles Frémont (three volumes, 1970–1984), make the original documents available. The conclusion of the war and its continuing legacy are described in Richard Griswold del Castillo, The Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo (1990) and Iris H. W. Engstrand and Griswold del Castillo, Culture y Cultura: Consequences of the U.S.-Mexican War (1998).
